The subdural injection of normal salt solution, normal serum, serum salvarsanized in vivo or weak solutions of cyanide of mercury does not demonstrably increase the permeability of the spinal cord or brain for salvarsan which is circulating in the blood at the time of the subdural injection.
1. In rabbits transient and also permanent enlargements of the heart occur as the result of the intravenous injection of adrenalin, spartein and adrenalin, diphtheria toxin, and streptococci. 2. Transient and permanent enlargements of the heart to the left are associated with decrease in the size of the upwardly directed waves of the Q, R, S group in Lead II of the electrocardiograms and increase in the downwardly directed. Transient enlargement to the right is associated with changes in the opposite direction. 3. The stages in the process of enlargement have been observed and are associated with gradual changes in the size of these waves. 4. A diminution in the size of all the waves of the Q, R, S group was observed in degenerative conditions of the heart muscle. 5. Extreme degeneration of the structures of the heart was associated with slowing of the heart's action, lengthening of conduction time (P-Q), and lengthening of the time occupied by the individual waves of the electrocardiogram. 6. Ectopic ventricular contractions were seen in rabbits injected intravenously with suspensions of living streptococci.
1. There are cases in which epithelial cell inclusions may alone be present in the conjunctival smears. In such cases no other pathogenic organisms, such as the Koch-Weeks bacillus or the pneurnococcus, can be demonstrated in smears or cultures. 2. The conjunctiva can become simultaneously infected with the inclusion bodies and Koch-Weeks bacilli or other organisms. 3. In cases of acute or subacute conjunctival inflammations due to mixed infections the clinical features of each infection may be present. The course of the inflammation is, however, more prolonged. 4. Within recent years, the Koch-Weeks bacillus has only seldom been found in our routine examinations. 5. The epidemic studied was of a severe type. 6. Clinically it is practically impossible to distinguish pneurnococcal conjunctivitis from the Koch-Weeks conjunctivitis. Bacteriological examination of smears and cultures is the only means by which the etiological diagnosis can be definitely established. 7. Conjunctivae of certain species of monkeys are susceptible to the von Prowazek inclusion bodies, but not to the hemoglobinophilic bacilli isolated from cases of epidemic conjunctivitis. 8. The injection of conjunctival scrapings containing the von Prowazek cell inclusions into the testicles of rabbits produces no cell inclusions in the latter, while the injection of a pure culture of the hemoglofcinophilic bacilli causes an acute inflammation accompanied by numerous clumps of the organisms, simulating the von Prowazek bodies at certain stages of their evolution. 9. There exists an apparent morphological similarity between the degenerated forms of this variety of the hemoglobinophilic bacilli and the cell inclusions, both in cultures and in experimental orchitis in the rabbit. But, as a rule, the elementary bodies of the latter are much smaller and more sharply defined than the smallest granules of the former, while the initial bodies are bigger, more intensely stainable, and less definite in their contour than the hemoglobinophilic bacilli found in the infected conjunctivae.
Four dogs have been subjected to metabolism studies before splenectomy and at intervals of three days to three months after splenectomy. In three of the four animals the removal of the spleen was not followed by any disturbances of nitrogen metabolism, fat utilization, or iron elimination. Two of these animals showed no anemia, and the third only a slight reduction in hemoglobin and number of red cells. A fourth animal, studied ten days and three months after splenectomy, developed eventually a definitely progressive anemia of moderate severity. This animal showed a slight loss of weight, a slight disturbance of nitrogen balance, and of creatine-creatinine partition, with a marked increase in the elimination of iron. We conclude therefore that the spleen has no important influence on metabolism, and that the disturbances occurring in one of our dogs were due to the coexisting anemia and not to the absence of the spleen.
1. We have confirmed the results of previous workers on tetrachlorphthalein, fibrinogen, and lipase. 2. The total non-protein nitrogen, urea, and amino-acids of the blood serum show a definite and sometimes marked increase in phosphorus poisoning. These changes are not so evident in chloroform poisoning, although they sometimes occur. They are usually terminal phenomena. 3. The urinary nitrogen partition between the urea, ammonia, and amino-acids is not always disturbed. The most important changes which occur are an increased amino nitrogen in chloroform and phosphorus poisoning, and a very low urea nitrogen percentage in severe fatal chloroform poisoning. 4. Sugar tolerance towards galactose and levulose is in general markedly decreased in both types of poisoning. 5. In phosphorus poisoning liver functional changes can and do occur without concomitant renal changes. Renal insufficiency usually arises as a terminal event. 6. Increased nitrogenous products in the blood (total non-protein nitrogen, urea, and amino nitrogen) are associated with an increase of these bodies in the urine. Consequently, an increased protein catabolism, as well as renal insufficiency, is necessary to explain this accumulation. 7. A terminal acidosis, as evidenced by increased hydrogen ion concentration in the blood, usually occurs.
The intoxication which is developed when splenectomized mice are fed with fresh spleen is more regular in occurrence when the feeding experiment is carried out four or five days after splenectomy than when it is done at later periods. The intoxication is easily recognizable even in its less severe forms by a lengthening of the coagulation time of the blood. An intoxication of the same character is produced when splenectomized mice are fed with the mucous membrane of the stomach and upper small intestine. Bone marrow and dried blood probably give the same reaction in a somewhat milder form. The other organs either give no intoxication at all when fed, or in certain instances the thyroid, adrenal, and salivary gland (mouse) give intoxications of a different character which affect intact mice and splenectomized animals equally. The spleen or the gastro-intestinal mucosa is equally effective in producing the intoxication, whether it be derived from heterologous or homologous species. Certain experiments, not reported in detail, indicate that the susceptibility to the intoxication disappears in time and that this time may be shortened by repeated feedings with sublethal amounts of organ substance.
Experiments are reported which show that in all probability the increased resistance to tuberculous infection which is imparted to mice by the removal of the spleen is a consequence of the loss of a function of the organ. This function can be restored by the feeding of fresh spleen. For the present we attribute these changes to the removal and restoration, as the case may be, of a particular substance for which the designation tuberculosplenatin is suggested. This substance is assumed to be related to the spleen as adrenalin is related to the adrenal gland. It is peculiar to the organ but not to the species. It is not found in other organs of the body so far as our observations have extended. The absence of the substance from the lymphatic glands seems of especial importance in this connection.
A method of measuring the rate of excretion of urea, in terms of the normal, as presented in a preceding paper, has been applied to the study of diseased conditions and of the action of drugs. Simultaneous observations on chloride excretion have been made by comparing the concentration of chlorides actually found in the plasma with the theoretical amount, calculated from the rate of excretion. Observations made in this way have been found applicable to the study of various diseased conditions.
1. A single small dose of ethylhydrocuprein (optochin base), which by itself has practically no protective effect against experimental pneumococcal infection in mice, is capable of increasing the threshold value of the type homologous antipneumococcus serum at least fifty times. 2. This effect is proportionately many times greater than a simple summation of the protective effects of these two bodies. 3. No such effect is obtained when the antiserum used is one produced against a strain of pneumococcus from a group other than that to which the infecting pneumococcus belongs.
1. The serum ferments are practically unaltered by a primary injection of foreign protein. 2. During the course of sensitization the injection of the antigen is followed by the mobilization of a non-specific protease which increases in rapidity and intensity as the maximum period of sensitization is reached. 3. Acute shock is accompanied by: (a) The instantaneous mobilization of a large amount of non-specific protease; (b) a decrease in antiferment; (c) an increase in non-coagulable nitrogen of the serum; (d) an increase in amino-acids; (e) a primary decrease in serum proteoses. 4. Later there is a progressive increase in the non-coagulable nitrogen, in proteoses, and in serum lipase. 5. The acute intoxication is brought about by the cleavage of serum proteins (and proteoses) through the peptone stage by a non-specific protease. 6. The specific elements lie in the rapid, mobilization of this ferment and the colloidal serum changes which bring about the change in antiferment titer.
In autoplastic transplanted nerves a degenerative process occurs which resembles the ordinary Wallerian degeneration, but appears a little more slowly than the latter. The cells of Schwann are in a condition of survival and are capable of multiplication after the transplantation. In homoplastic transplanted nerves I have found a degenerative process resembling a Wallerian degeneration, somewhat delayed. The cells of Schwann multiply, and for some time at least are in a condition of survival. After twelve to fourteen days an abundant and increasing immigration of lymphocytes is observed, and from the eighteenth day the cells of Schwann develop a necrobiotic appearance. In heteroplastic transplanted nerves numerous myelin ovoids are formed during the first four to five days, but there is no proliferation of the cells of Schwann, and no Wallerian degeneration is seen. The graft becomes necrotic within about two weeks. The formation of ovoids that occurs during the first four to five days after the performance of the heteroplastic transplantation does not reveal the condition of the life of the graft. This formation of myelin ovoids is found in the nerve fibers when they have been kept in an incubator for twenty-four hours in Ringer solution (Nageotte(12)) or in homologous or heterologous serum, but it is not found in the fibers after their incubation in isotonic salt solution (Nageotte), the presence of calcium being necessary for the occurrence of ovoid formation. Heteroplastic transplanted nerves become necrotic. They are unsuitable for bridges in cases of nerve defects, and my results explain the failure of the attempts at heteroplastic transplantation of nerves in human beings. If we wish to bridge a nerve defect by implantation we must use autoplastic or homoplastic grafts. The occurrence of a Wallerian degeneration in these grafts during the first two to three weeks after the transplantation should make bridging a promising operation; for in this period the grafts resemble the peripheral part of a divided nerve and must be assumed to be capable of regeneration, and thus are very different from dead material. I have studied the process of regeneration, and shall communicate in a future article my results of bridging defects, which are encouraging as far as the function is concerned. My results with homoplastic transplantation of nerves have a bearing on the homoplastic transplantation of limbs, which has been successfully performed in dogs by Carrel. None of his dogs lived long enough to show any function of the transplanted leg. The practical value of this operation is dependent, of course, upon the return of function, and especially on the regeneration of the nerves in the transplanted leg. The results with homoplastic transplantation of nerves seem to indicate the possibility of a regeneration of the nerves in a homoplastic transplanted leg.
1. The placental blood film examination is worthy of routine application wherever aestivo-autumnal malaria is endemic. This type of malaria when associated with labor and the early days of the puerperium can be more easily and certainly diagnosed by the use of this film and a polychrome stain than by employing the usual films made from the mother's peripheral blood at the time of labor. The placental film in such an infection offers an abundance of adult parasites and far more evidence of the presence of pigment, while the peripheral blood film frequently offers but a scant number of the small ring or discoid forms of a parasite. The examination of the present series revealed positive placental films in nineteen cases, while but eight of these same cases were positive in the peripheral blood film examination. On the other hand, no peripheral blood films were found positive in which the associated placental films did not reveal a far more abundant evidence of the infection. 2. The early days of the puerperium can by this method be protected many times from a malarial outburst, and, as a rule, puerperal sepsis can be differentiated. 3. The intricate vascular architecture of the mature placenta rivals that of the spleen, liver, and bone marrow as a harbor for adult malarial parasites of this type and as a storage for pigment. 4. The localization of parasites in the placenta is unique. Here is the one vascular system which particularly favors the development of the parasites but which at the same time is so situated that it may be spontaneously discarded by the body at the climax of the attack. By this simple act late in pregnancy the prognosis for both mother and child may be improved. 5. The pregnant state encourages attacks of malaria by lowering bodily resistance and by furnishing an additional harbor for the development of parasites. A tenable theory in regard to most attacks of this nature, occurring in cases under professional care, would appear to be the development of latent malaria (malarial carriers) into acute attacks toward the close of the pregnant state. The women who expose themselves (as the negroes in this series) offer favorable conditions to the introduction of a primary infection. Malaria frequently interrupts the late stages of pregnancy and sometimes causes the death of the mother and the fetus, more often the latter. The records at Ancon indicate that it more frequently exerts a harmful influence than other types of infectious diseases in this locality. 6. Most of the children in this series that were delivered while malaria was present in the mother, were of a race that seems to possess a relative immunity to the ravages of malaria. This may account for the fact that the negro fetus more nearly approximates the full term of development when associated with this disease and is comparatively subjected to a less number of the accidents of pregnancy. Many of them revealed evidence of prematurity and were jaundiced, but, as a rule, they developed rapidly. The commonest mishap is miscarriage late in pregnancy. Occasional still-births occur and sometimes there is a fatal issue to both the mother and child. 7. Cases diagnosed as congenital malaria probably indicate that some accident occurred to the placenta, because it practically never happens that fetal blood is positive at the time of birth, regardless of the degree of infection in the mother. Many of the cases now reported in the literature as congenital malaria suggest immediate postnatal infection as their history, as our pathological and clinical records testify. 8. The size of the intervillous spaces of the placenta and their adaptability in the localization of parasites seem to disprove to a certain extent the old idea that the localization depends on the smallness of the capillary caliber. If this were the case the brain should be more often the seat of an extensive localization than the spleen, bone marrow, and placenta, yet our anatomical records will not support that theory. A sluggish blood sinus with a large endothelial surface, a higher internal body temperature, and red blood cells burdened with parasites of a certain age beyond the ring form seem to be important factors in the localization and development of the aestivo-autumnal parasite. 9. The racial disparity of malarial infections shown in this series is believed to be due to local conditions and a wrong impression is apt to be given by our statistics in regard to the relative immunity of the negro race. The white women on the Canal Zone avail themselves of all the opportunities the sanitary system affords; they live well and place the entire course of their pregnant state under competent professional care, while the negro woman is indifferent to her pregnant state, works as a domestic servant, and lives in the cheapest unprotected quarters that can be rented in the suburban divisions of Panama City where the malarial rate is highest and the sanitary control is difficult. It should be noted that these negro women can carry an infection with little manifestation of its presence that would produce serious results in the white women brought from the temperate zone regions of Europe and the United States.
Influenza bacilli isolated from various pathological processes in man differ widely in pathogenic power for animals, especially rabbits. While the cultures derived from the leptomeninges and blood, and rarely from the pneumonic lung are pathogenic, those generally derived from the respiratory tract exhibit little or no virulence for rabbits. The two types of cultures as indicated by virulence for animals do not differ in kind, but only in degree, in relation to the serological tests of agglutination, complement deviation, and opsonification. The two types of cultures do, however, differ with respect to their ability to undergo autolysis. While the virulent cultures autolyze almost completely, yielding a turbid supernatant fluid and little sediment, the non-virulent cultures give rise to an abundant sediment and a clear supernatant fluid. The non-virulent cultures incite far less antibody production in rabbits. Hence, rabbits inoculated with non-virulent strains yield sera possessing low antibody content. Conversely, rabbits inoculated with virulent strains yield sera possessing a higher content of antibody. In keeping with and possibly because of the low antibody content of the sera of rabbits inoculated with the non-pathogenic strains, the rabbits so treated are not, as a rule, protected against subsequent inoculation with virulent strains. . Influenza bacilli therefore vary in pathogenic effect both for man and animals, but they are not distinguishable by means of serological reactions into different types. Apparently all influenza bacilli belong to one class or race irrespective of origin or virulence.
An active antipneumococcus serum causes agglutination of pneumococci in vitro and in vivo. The antiserum acts in far greater dilution in causing agglutination as determined by the microscopic than by the macroscopic test. The antiserum when injected into the circulation of rabbits suffering from pneumococcus bacteremia causes a rapid disappearance of the diplococci from the blood. This disappearance is brought about by instantaneous clumping of the diplococci in vivo and the removal of the clumps by the liver, spleen, lungs, and possibly other organs.
The treatment of pneumococcic septicemia in the rabbits by large doses of immune serum is detrimental, since the serum causes the formation of large clumps of bacteria in the blood which are taken out chiefly by the vessels of the lungs in which they accumulate and impede the circulation. The large doses of serum are also detrimental when they follow upon small ones through which the small clumps formed are deposited in the spleen, liver, and other organs. In this instance, the large amount of serum leads to the destruction of the pneumococci under conditions which promote an intoxication. The precise mechanism of this action is not known. The treatment of pneumococcic septicemia in rabbits by small repeated doses of immune serum can be successfully carried out. The number of pneumococci capable of being brought to destruction through phagocytosis in the organs in this way is very great. Not all the rabbits treated with small repeated doses of the serum survive. Those that succumb do so not to a general infection but to a pneumococcus meningitis. The explanation of this phenomenon is simple. When the number of pneumococci originally inoculated is very great a small number penetrate into the subdural space. Those in this space do not come under the influence of the serum, hence they are not agglutinated and prepared for phagocytosis, whence they multiply and set up a fatal meningitis. The activity of the immune serum administered in this way against virulent pneumococci is so great that a revision of our notions in the limit of powers of the anti-infectious sera seems necessary. It is patent that the problem is not simply a relation between quantity of immune bodies and number of bacteria. It is more complex than that conception indicates. The factor of the leucocytes and the degree of their possible activities under the conditions of the experiment come into play. Hereafter, in defining the mode and power of action of anti-infectious sera the condition of cooperation of the body-forces will have to be more strictly considered.
Typhoid bacilli are agglutinated promptly in the circulating blood of normal rabbits and quickly removed from the blood stream. The clumped bacilli accumulate in the organs and are taken up by assembled polymorphonuclear leucocytes in the liver, spleen, and possibly other organs. The phagocyted clumps of bacilli are digested and destroyed by the phagocytes. Hence, destruction of typhoid bacilli intra vitam is brought about by an entirely different process than is the destruction by serum and whole blood in vitro. While the latter is caused by bacteriolysis, the former results from agglutination and intraphagocytic digestion. Lysis by fresh blood serum is not appreciably affected by spleen or kidney pulp, but it is inhibited by liver pulp. The action of the liver is referable to its biliary constituents, which exert anticomplementary action. Probably in certain examples of typhoid fever in man the typhoid bacilli in the circulating blood being inagglutinable cannot be removed by the organs and hence are not phagocyted and destroyed. The observed disparity between the ready destruction of typhoid bacilli by serum and shed blood and the resistance sometimes offered by the bacilli in the infected body is explained by the essential differences in the destructive processes in operation within and without the body.
1. Small quantities of antiserum bring about instantaneous agglutination of pneumococci in the circulation of the rabbit; the reaction is specific and occurs in every case in which sufficient serum is given to influence the course of the septicemia or to prolong the life of the animal. 2. The agglutinating titer of antipneurnococcus serum can be made considerably higher by adding only a small quantity of culture to the tests, thus making the test a finer differential. 3. Typhoid bacilli agglutinate spontaneously in the circulation of the normal rabbit; the reaction is positive in vivo even in cases in which undiluted serum gives a negative result in vitro; heating the bacilli to 80 degrees C. for thirty minutes renders them more agglutinable in vivo. 4. Dysentery bacilli of the Shiga type do not agglutinate in the blood stream of the normal rabbit, but a small quantity of antiserum injected into the circulation causes immediate agglutination; while all strains of the Flexner group undergo spontaneous agglutination. 5. Non-virulent influenza bacilli agglutinate spontaneously in the circulation of the normal rabbit; virulent strains remain in the blood unclumped. 6. In all instances so far investigated of both passive and natural immunity, agglutination of the bacteria within the blood of the infected animal was followed by a rapid removal of the bacteria from the circulation, and by phagocytosis and destruction of the agglutinated bacteria in the capillary systems of the viscera; while those bacteria which are not agglutinated remain in the circulation and produce a progressive septicemia. 7. Hence the agglutinins seem to play the decisive part in at least certain instances of bacterial infections.
From the data provided by our investigations we may conclude that in all pathologic processes of the cortex which end in dementia and death, the fatty degeneration of the elements of the cortex plays a not unimportant part. The characteristic change for most of the psychoses is found in a great increase in amount of fatty deposits when compared to normal individuals of the same age. In some processes such as senile dementia and dementia praecox the fatty substance appears to fill completely the cell body, and these cells have apparently lost all their functioning power. It is not common to find the fatty deposits in the processes of the ganglion cells except in dementia praecox, and to a limited extent in senile dementia. In other cases the pathological variety of the fatty deposits in the ganglion cells is seen to be diffused over the whole ganglion cell. We were able especially to observe this in infectious psychoses, in general paralysis, and in epilepsy. The so called central neuritis assumes a peculiar attitude in that it plainly leads swiftly to an acute fatty degeneration of the ganglion cells, in which there exists an inclination of the fatty granules to flow together into large masses. Frequently the fatty degeneration of the ganglion cells appears to be connected with the sclerosis of the cells, especially when it is a matter of slowly progressing alterations of degeneration. The behavior of the glia is not wholly uniform in the various disease processes. In chronic disease processes we often find that the extent of the fatty accumulations in the ganglion cells does not correspond to an equal increase in the glia cells, while the otherwise acutely degenerative alteration in the nuclei of the glia is noticeable. In acute processes we see regularly an equal accumulation of the fat in both species of cell. The conditions of the cells in the vascular wall are wholly similar to those of the glia cells. We must therefore assume that in chronic diseases the fatty substance has been carried out of the glia and the vascular walls while it has been retained longer in the ganglion cells. Among all the disease processes amaurotic idiocy assumes a peculiar position. We have observed that in addition to the fatty materials of the scarlet fat stain, still other fatty materials, lipoid in character, have made their appearance. While the study of the fatty deposit in the cerebral cortex offers some points for a differential diagnosis, yet it is not adopted in all cases, since the distinction in individual disease processes is not always characteristic. From the preceding examination, however, in many cases there result important findings which briefly we summarize as follows: 1. In all degenerative alterations in the cerebral cortex the mass of the lipoid materials in the ganglion cells in comparison with that in healthy individuals of equal age is found to be considerably augmented. In the alteration of the lipoid materials in the ganglion cells two types in general may be distinguished: (a) An augmentation of the lipoid materials in the ganglion cells, in places where normally a small amount of fat is found, (b) An augmentation of the lipoid materials over the entire cell. 2. The first type we find also characteristic in senile dementia. The second type occurs in acute infectious psychoses, general paralysis, and well advanced epilepsy. 3. While the advanced lipoid degeneration of the ganglion cells in senile dementia has already been described in many ways, it has appeared from our investigations that also in the young chronic cases of dementia praecox far-reaching fatty degeneration of the ganglion cells, especially in the second and third cortical strata, likewise occurs. These findings should constitute an important contribution to the pathological anatomy of dementia praecox. 4. The so called central neuritis represents a peculiar disease process according to the appearance of the fatty degeneration, since this fatty degeneration reaches a very advanced degree, and also in so far as it deviates from other disease processes in that here there comes out very distinctly in the picture an inclination of the fatty granules to flow together. 5. Amaurotic idiocy also represents a particular disease process in respect to the lipoid degeneration, since here in addition to otherwise distributed scarlet stain lipoid materials, still other specific lipoid materials make their appearance.
1. All arsenical compounds do not produce the same type of renal injury. 2. In general, there are two broad groups of kidneys produced, the red and the pale, with a variety of subdivisions of each group depending upon modifications in the chemical constitution of the compound, dosage, and length of survival of the animal.
1. We have shown that the type of renal lesion produced by compounds of arsenic varies widely: while some arsenicals produce changes in which vascular injury predominates, others produce an equally dominant tubular injury. 2. In either of these groups the character and degree of the vascular or tubular injury produced by different compounds shows further variation, such that the lesions of different arsenicals of the same group are not identical. Each compound of arsenic that we have tested, therefore, produces a lesion-complex in the kidney that is relatively characteristic for that compound. 3. The mode and character of the action of arsenicals are dependent upon the chemical constitution of the compound.
1. Toxic doses of all arsenicals of which we have any knowledge produce definite pathological changes in the adrenals of guinea pigs. These changes include congestion, hemorrhage, disturbances in the lipoid content, cellular degenerations and necroses, and reduction in the chromaffin content. 2. The character and severity of the injury produced by different arsenicals varies with the chemical constitution of the compounds. 3. From these facts, we believe that adrenal injury is an important factor in arsenical intoxication and suggest that therapeutic doses of some arsenicals may produce adrenal stimulation.
1. The serum of rabbits which have been previously treated with a single dose of ethylhydrocuprein (optochin) exerts a bactericidal action on, and, later, inhibits the growth of pneumococci in the test-tube. 2. These actions are most evident in the serum of rabbits when the base (optochin base) is given in oil subcutaneously; somewhat less when the hydrochloride of the drug is given in water subcutaneously; slight when the base is given in oil intramuscularly; and least evident, or absent, when the hydrochloride in water is introduced directly into the stomach. To get these effects by the intravenous route, toxic doses must be given, and, even with toxic non-fatal doses, the effects do not last long. 3. In the case of the base given in oil subcutaneously to rabbits in a dosage of 0.1 gram per kilo of body weight, the bactericidal action of the serum is at its maximum about one hour after administration, and it passes into an inhibitory effect about four hours after the drug has been given. 4. In man the same inhibitory and bactericidal actions of the serum are present when a single dose of 0.5 gram of the hydrochloride of the drug is given by the mouth or subcutaneously, but the bactericidal action is not so marked as in rabbits. 5. When the optochin concentration in the serum has, apparently,. diminished to a certain point in relation to the number of pneumococci present, the pneumococci which have survived the bactericidal action for a few hours acquire the power of growing freely.
1. The crisis in pneumonia is usually accompanied by (a) decrease in the serum antiferment; (b) the mobilization of a non-specific protease in the serum; (c) an increase in serum lipase; (d) a decrease in the non-coagulable nitrogen, and of the proteoses in the serum. 2. The crisis is associated with the beginning of an active autolysis, the latter depending on an altered relation between the ferment-antiferment balance. 3. The fibrin and leucocytic debris must be considered as one of the potential sources of toxic substances. With rapid autolysis proceeding, only non-toxic materials are absorbed.
1. The intoxication produced by the intravenous injection of inert substances such as kaolin is due to protein split products derived from the serum proteins. 2. The kaolin acts as an adsorbing medium for the serum antiferment, bringing about an alteration in the ferment-antiferment balance. 3. The intoxication is accompanied by an increase in serum protease, and of proteoses. 4. The serum lipase, the amino-acids, and the total non-coagulable nitrogen show relatively little change. 5. The antiferment shows an initial increase, followed by a loss.
1. In dogs the toxic effect of primary proteoses is usually associated with the following serum changes: (a) an increase in serum antiferment, with a following fall in titer; (b) some increase in serum protease; (c) an increase in serum lipase; (d) a decrease in serum proteoses and amino nitrogen. 2. Secondary proteoses produce (a) less marked changes in the antiferment titer; (b) a marked increase in serum protease; (c) an increase in serum proteoses; (d) only a slight change in serum lipase; (e) a primary decrease in amino nitrogen. 3. The peptone which we have used (prepared from dog muscle) caused (a) a change in antiferment titer similar to that produced by the primary proteoses; (b) a marked increase in serum protease; (c) only a slight increase in serum lipase; (d) a primary decrease in proteoses, followed by an increase later; (e) an increase in amino-acids. 4. A very small dose of peptone resulted in a decrease in antiferment titer, together with a primary decrease in serum protease. 5. The peptone preparation was non-toxic when introduced into the stomach or rectum, while the intestinal injection was followed by an immediate intoxication.
1. The intravenous injection of killed organisms is followed by the mobilization of a non-specific protease and lipase; the rapidity and extent of this reaction depend upon the toxicity of the organism and on the resistance of the organism to proteolysis. 2. The temperature and leucocytic curve bear no relation to the ferment changes. 3. The serum antiferment is usually increased after the injection. 4. Of the organisms studied, the typhoid bacilli produced the most marked ferment changes, and the tubercle bacilli the least. 5. The toxicity of the dried organisms cannot depend wholly upon proteolysis in vivo, but must depend in part on the preformed toxic substances liberated on lysis. 6. Serum protease should not be considered as the sole exciter of intoxication through the production of protein split products; it seems possible that its function may in part be one of detoxication.
1. Probably in the majority of cases it is possible, with scrupulous technique, to isolate the tubercle bacillus from contaminated material such as the sputum, by the method outlined by Petroff. 2. It is necessary to use several tubes. 3. Neutralization, drying, temperature of the incubator, and contamination after the growth has started are important points to be noted in the process. 4. The colonies start as pin points, becoming larger and confluent, but still preserving individual groups of a dry appearance which simulate the medium closely in color. 5. The bacillus of tuberculosis in young culture is tinctorially acid-fast and of a polymorphous morphology.
By a process of sensitization described it was found possible to cause arthritis in rabbits constantly after one intravenous injection of the streptococcus. This reaction is specific. By intravenous inoculation, without previous sensitization, of the streptococcus used in these experiments it was possible to cause arthritis in rabbits only after three or more injections. An analogy is suggested between the arthritis induced by sensitization and the relapses in human rheumatic fever. A further analogy is suggested between the development in rabbits of arthritis after repeated intravenous injections and the development of the primary lesion in human rheumatic fever.
The results of these experiments permit a comparison of the action of strophanthin in the normal and the infected animals. In cats the percentage of deaths following the injection of 0.1 mg. of strophanthin per kilo of body weight was the same in normal and in pneumonic cats. The number of recoveries in this series was larger than was expected. This result was due to the fact that the dose injected was not the lethal dose, but the average lethal dose (0.1 mg.) determined by Hatcher and Brody (7) and by Eggleston (8). The doses which the latter actually injected ranged from 0.085 rng. to 0.16 mg.; from these the average minimal lethal dose was calculated. In adopting the average dose as the standard one to inject, those of our cats that required more than 0.1 mg. naturally survived. The death rate was therefore low. The plan employed in dogs differed from that used in cats. A lethal dose was injected in each dog. Death occurred when an average of 0.12 mg. of strophanthin per kilo of body weight was injected. The same dose was required in normal and pneumonic dogs. The effect of strophanthin in both groups of infected and non-infected cats and dogs is, therefore, identical. Whether the uniformity of strophanthin action in the two experimental groups may serve as the basis for assuming a like uniformity of action in normal individuals and in pneumonia patients is a subject which requires further analysis. The difficulty in transferring the experimental results to patients lies in the question of whether the type of pneumonia produced in animals is the same as that found in man. Clinically, the two diseases present both resemblances and differences. The animals become definitely ill and show the symptoms already described. The illness, however, is of short duration and apparently reaches its height in the majority of animals in twenty-four to seventy-two hours. Before the expiration of this time, the temperature frequently returns to normal. Many of the infected animals, when they survive, recover in three to five days. The mortality in dogs infected with pneumococci is given by Lamar and Meltzer as 16 per cent. In the present series of twelve infected cats, the mortality was also 16 per cent. These findings differ from human pneumonia in the following particulars: The infection is not so severe; the temperature, though elevated at first, soon falls; the duration of the disease is short; and convalescence is rapid. The mortality is slightly lower. Musser and Norris (12) give the human mortality at 21.06 per cent. Pathologically the two diseases also show differences. The gross appearance of the lungs is not dissimilar, but in the animals the consolidated portions are somewhat dry and they fail to show a stage of gray hepatization (5). The amount of fibrin present is small. There is comparatively slight congestion of the alveolar walls and of the walls of the bronchi. The relation of experimental pneumonias to the human disease has been discussed by a number of investigators. Almost all believe that the two types are similar, if not identical. Among the first to express this opinion was Sternberg (13) ; and later Gamaleia (14), Prudden and Northrup (15), Kinyoun and Rosenau (16), Wadsworth (17), Lamar and Meltzer (5), Wollstein and Meltzer (9) coincided with his view. Lamar and Meltzer, especially, have insisted on the identity of the two processes. On the other hand, Welch (18) in his study of experimental pneumonia, says: "Many inoculations of cultures of virulent pneumococci into the trachea and lungs of dogs have been made in my laboratory by Dr. Canfield and myself, but in no instance were we able to produce an inflammation of the lungs which we were willing to identify with acute lobar pneumonia as found in human beings." But he adds that, in the majority of experiments, there was no demonstrable consolidation and that pleurisy and more or less extensive areas of pneumonia were produced only in a few animals. The inference consequently cannot be drawn that an effect obtained with strophanthin in the experimental disease may be anticipated in man. The striking similarity in action in infected and uninfected animals renders it likely, however, that the usual action of the drug in man may be expected in the presence of pneumonia. We have accumulated evidence, to be published later, which shows that this action actually takes place in the human disease. As far as evidence obtained electrocardiographically is concerned, our experiments show that strophanthin causes the same electrical changes in the heart when the animals are infected as it does under normal conditions.
1. It is possible to split a strain of mice into certain substrains in which the tumor incidence is in some way linked to the color of the mice. Thus we could split off from the English strain, which as a whole and in various substrains with mixed colors (English A and Sable) has a high tumor rate, substrains with light tan color and pink eyes (IOI and Tan) which have a high tumor rate like the large majority of the English mice, and two other apparently recessive strains breeding true, which have a very low tumor incidence (Silver and Silver Fawn). Therefore, certain combinations of factors which determine certain colors of mice determine at the same time the tumor incidence of these strains or substrains. In the majority of cases isolated families bred through several generations separately from the majority of the other substrains give approximately the same tumor rates as the others; in some cases, however, it may perhaps be possible to separate from the main strain a family with a different rate. 2. The tumor incidence and the tumor age found in the earlier periods of our work are approximately the same as in the more recent period. On the whole, the results obtained in successive generations of the same strain also agree well with each other; the results are fairly constant; the deviations which occur are in most cases due to the small number of animals observed in the certain generations. Discarding all the mice dying in the first or in the first and second periods of life usually does not alter essentially the tumor ratio of a certain strain. 3. A certain relationship exists between tumor frequency and tumor age. On the whole, the more frequent the tumors, the earlier they appear in the various strains. This parallelism between tumor frequency and tumor age is, however, not complete. The tumor age seems to be as characteristic for a certain strain as the tumor rate. Certain substrains which differ in tumor frequency may show approximately the same tumor age. Strains with similar tumor frequency may show a different tumor age. We may therefore conclude that in all probability tumor rate and tumor age represent distinct unit factors, which are frequently, but not in all cases, linked in some manner to each other. 4. The age at which the maximum of tumors appears varies in different strains. The maximum may fall into the second or third period of life. On the whole, the maximum is reached at an earlier period of life in those strains which have a high tumor rate. But here also peculiarities exist in different strains.
These experiments indicate, therefore, that when hemoglobin is set free in the portal circulation a larger amount is held by the liver and converted rapidly into bile pigment than is the case when it is set free in the general circulation, and that, under the former condition, over-loading of the liver with bile pigment more readily occurs and jaundice is more apt to develop. This mechanical influence must, therefore, be a factor in the lessened tendency after splenctomy to the jaundice which follows blood destruction due to hemolytic agents, for whether the spleen be an active factor in destroying the erythrocytes or whether it plays merely a passive part as a place for the deposition of the disintegrating cells, there can be no question that in this organ, when it is present, a large number of cells undergo their final disintegration after the action of hemolytic poisons, and that the hemoglobin there liberated passes by the portal system directly to the liver. When the spleen is removed, this disintegration occurs in other organs, notably in the lymph nodes and bone marrow, and the hemoglobin from these organs passes not into the portal but into the general circulation, from which it reaches the liver more gradually and in a more dilute form.
The anemia which develops after splenectomy is most marked in animals on a mixed table scrap diet of meat, bread, cereals, and vegetables, which is essentially a cooked diet. Control studies in which a unilateral nephrectomy precedes splenectomy demonstrate that the anemia is not due to operation, hemorrhage, or accidents of convalescence but develops only in the absence of the spleen. The results of studies of the influence of food containing a large amount of iron in presumably easily utilizable form, as in raw beef spleen, do not support the view that the anemia is due to lack of iron in the food. Observation on the influence of a diet of raw meat as contrasted with cooked meat shows a more severe anemia in animals on the cooked diet and suggests the possibility that heat alters some substance which, in the absence of the spleen, the body cannot utilize. A final conclusion in regard to this point must, however, await the results of more detailed studies now in progress.
The development of the collateral circulation after ligation of the innominate and right common carotid arteries for subclavian aneurysm was studied in two cases by measuring the rate of blood flow in the hand's from time to time. In a woman, sixty-eight years old, the flow in the right hand three weeks after the operation was two-sevenths of that in the left. Nineteen weeks after the operation the flow in the right hand was more than three-fourths of that in the left, although no pulse returned until long afterwards. In a man, twenty-five years old, the flow in the right hand eleven days after the operation was between one-fourth and one-fifth of that in the left. Seventeen days after the operation the flow in the right hand was nearly one-third of the flow in the left. Twenty-four days after the operation the flow in the right hand had increased to more than one-half of the left hand flow. Thirty-one days after the operation the flow in the right hand was three-fifths of that in the left, without return, as yet, of any pulsation. Before the operation the flow in the right hand was markedly greater than in the left, notwithstanding the small size of the right radial pulse as compared with the left. The explanation of this fact is discussed.
1. Potassium citrate, potassium oxalate, and calcium lactate accelerate the action of tissue and serum esterases. 2. Intravenous and intraperitoneal injections of large amounts of sodium citrate do not cause a definite increase in the activity of the serum esterase.
1. Liver tissue showing fatty degeneration obtained from animals poisoned with phosphorus or chloroform contains a decreased amount of esterase. 2. The serum of animals poisoned with phosphorus or chloroform has a high esterase activity. 3. The increased amount of esterase in the serum is not derived from the disintegrating liver cells as the esterase in the blood of the hepatic vein is less than that found elsewhere.
1. In crossing strains known to diner in their tumor rates, the hybrids show in a considerable number of cases a tumor rate corresponding to the parent with a high tumor incidence; in some cases the offspring have the tumor rate of the parent with the low tumor incidence; in certain cases the tumor rate of the offspring is intermediate between those of the parents. That these results are not accidental follows from the fact that we could show in some cases that two sisters crossed with the same strains or with the same male give similar offspring, and in other cases we could show that the same individual crossed successively with two strains that behave similarly produces hybrids with a similar tumor incidence. 2. There exists some evidence for the conclusion that different strains in being crossed with other strains differ in their power to impress their tumor rate upon the crosses. Thus the English strain and the I and II daughters of No. 10 have the tendency to transmit to the offspring a high tumor rate, while Cream, Silver, and some European other than 151 have a tendency to transmit a low tumor rate. While crosses of these daughters of No. 10 with European 151 or with No. 8(1/2) show the high tumor rate of the mothers, the crosses of one of the same females with Cream or Silver show an intermediate tumor rate. 3. We find further evidence for our conclusion previously stated that age class, of the tumors and tumor rate are not dependent on the same factor. The age class enters into the crosses as a factor independent of the tumor rate. Thus we find in the crosses between the first daughter of No. 10 and Cream, and in the crosses between the same female and English Silver a similar tumor rate, but the age classes differ in conformity with the difference in the age classes of the parents. We find, furthermore, that while in some cases a tumor rate and an age class that correspond to each other (high tumor rate, early tumors-low tumor rate, late tumors) are transmitted to the offspring, in other cases tumor rate and age class transmitted to the crosses diverge. 4. It seems that certain strains with very late tumors if mated with strains with earlier tumors have a tendency to transmit to the offspring their own tendency to very late tumors. With a certain strain lateness of the tumors seems to be dominant, while a low tumor rate is not necessarily dominant in the same crosses. This was noticeable in the crosses into which the strain European +/- 102 or 103 entered as one of the parents. 5. If both parents have a similar tumor rate the offspring have usually a similar tumor rate. There was, however, one exception to this rule in the case of the German +/- Carter mice, in which the offspring showed a much lower tumor rate and higher age class than either of the parent strains.
The complete removal of the function of the pancreas concerned in digestion is followed by marked changes in the spleen and in the thyroid apparatus. Second, the spleen shows an extreme simple atrophy. Third, the thyroid apparatus exhibits a constant change shown by the macroscopic transparency of the gland, by the microscopic increase in the amount of colloid, by the chemical increase of the iodine content of the gland, and by the functional test of the delayed appearance of tetany after the complete removal of the thyroid apparatus.
We may conclude that the feeding of dried thyroid gland to tadpoles causes an early differentiation in proportion to the quantity fed or the percentage of iodine content of the gland used. With the larger doses and the higher iodine percentages, metabolism is stimulated to such an extent that the animals emaciate rapidly and die early, before there is time for much differentiation. With smaller amounts and lower iodine percentages the size of the animals is roughly inversely proportional to the amount or percentage, so that a close association of differentiation with pigmy size is not characteristic of thyroid feeding as such, as Gudenatsch seems to conclude. One may see early and marked differentiation along with large size. It all seems a question of dosage. The larger sizes are associated with slower differentiation, the smaller sizes with more rapid differentiation, and the smallest sizes may show no differentiation at all, due to the extremely rapid and marked emaciation, and early death. Non-thyroid iodine does not have this effect. The thyroid effect is inhibited by exposure to cold and by cracker feeding. Exposure to cold probably acts by lowering metabolism; cracker feeding, by substituting food other than the animal's own tissues to meet the increased demands caused by the stimulating effect of the thyroid feeding. Gudenatsch in his earlier paper speaks of the thyroid as stimulating metabolism, which leads to early differentiation and suppresses growth. Later he seems to lean to the view that the thyroid possesses some specific influence on differentiation. It may all be a matter of words, but our present conception is that we are simply dealing with the well known action of thyroid on metabolism. As the iodine content increases, the thyroid increasingly stimulates the metabolism of the tadpole, which undergoes changes in size, increased growth or rapid emaciation, according to the strength of the action. The tadpole being a larval form, the tissues first to be stimulated to increased metabolism, and later the first to be consumed, are naturally those tissues whose normal function is approaching a normal end, and which, in the normal course of events, are about to undergo metamorphosis. Hastening of differentiation seems then to ensue not as a specific stimulation of differentiation, but only to be the normal result of the stimulation of general metabolism. The seeming specificity of the result lies not in a new action of thyroid, but in its application to a living organism at a specific time in its development. Most important, of course, is the confirmation of what we may be justified in regarding as an established fact; namely, that the activity and potency of the physiologically active substance of the thyroid is measurable in terms of its percentage iodine content. Finally, it may be pointed out that the reaction of tadpoles to thyroid feeding is so sensitive that the procedure might well serve as a biological test for the activity of thyroid tissue, superior even to chemical methods.
The foregoing experiments show that in cats a definite lobar pneumonia may be caused by Bacillus mucosus capsulatus. Judging both from the clinical course and from the pathological findings, this form of pulmonary infection differs from the usual pneumococcus types of pneumonia and closely resembles the so called Friedlnder's bacillus or Bacillus pneumonioe in man. In all instances in which a lobar pneumonia was found after the injection of the bacillus, a similar organism was recovered from the lung, and in no case was this associated with other organisms. The course of the disease in cats is very short, the animals developing early symptoms of profound toxemia. In 87 per cent of the animals showing a lobar pneumonia positive blood cultures were obtained. The pathological findings, judging from the early stages of the disease, are subject to considerable variation. In some instances the process may suggest a pseudolobar or confluent lobular distribution. In these cases the lung has a mottled, marble-like appearance. In the majority of cases, however, the process gave a more homogeneous appearance, suggesting a diffuse and uniform distribution. Foci of hemorrhage were not uncommon in both. Such areas cause the mottled appearance sometimes found. In all instances the consolidated lung presents a greater infiltration of tissue than is usually seen in other types of experimental pneumonia. Although the exudate as seen on the cut surface may be abundant and especially viscid in character, this is not present in most cases. The cut surface of the consolidated lung does not present a granular appearance. The histological findings are also subject to considerable variation. In most instances the infundibular and alveolar spaces are completely filled with an exudate made up chiefly of polymorphonuclear cells. Associated with these are the capsulated bacilli, large vacuolated mononuclear phagocytic cells, and red blood cells, and occasionally small amounts of fibrin. The organisms may vary greatly in numbers. Some sections show spaces almost completely filled with bacilli. The contrast between spaces containing an exudate consisting chiefly of polymorphonuclear forms and an adjoining one filled with organisms is often striking (Fig. 4). The bacilli found are both intra- and extracellular. The large vacuolated cells are numerous in this type of pneumonia. They apparently are the first cells to become phagocytic. Often they are seen to contain as many as 10 to 15 capsulated bacilli, while polymorphonuclear cells in the same exudate contain no organisms. The histogenesis of these cells seems to be somewhat clearer from the study of these early stages of pneumonia. In many instances one sees swollen, partially desquamated epithelial cells along the alveolar wall. These closely resemble the large vacuolated forms. Various types of these vacuolated mononuclear cells were observed. These may well represent stages of development from the desquamating epithelial cell to the large vacuolated form. Although similar cells may arise elsewhere, we have been led to regard them in our studies as epithelial in origin (Fig. 5). The number of red blood cells and the amount of fibrin present in the exudate vary greatly. Small foci consisting of alveolar spaces filled with erythrocytes are not uncommon. The fibrin is very much less abundant than in most types of pneumonia. From the above experiments it is seen that a lobar pneumonia in cats can be produced at least by two methods, either by intrabronchial insufflation of the organism or by direct injection into the veins, provided that in the latter case an irritant is introduced into the lungs. In each case there is little doubt but that a local injury of the lung parenchyma was produced. Without this injury (that is, by intravenous injection of the organism alone), no pulmonary lesion was obtained. Further studies with both these methods must be undertaken to ascertain more exactly the sequence of the pathological process. It seems probable that they are identical in each case. The results obtained from the second method employed to produce a lobar pneumonia offer suggestive evidence in support of a hematogenous causation of this disease in at least certain instances. It is not proposed to discuss the aerogenous versus hernatogenous theories at this time. Kidd(5) has recently reviewed the subject and states that the aerogenous theory for the causation of pneumonia is most widely held. This view has gained credence especially since the work of Meltzer and Lamar. In spite of this, Kidd emphasizes the fact that based on our knowledge of pulmonary infections in man and upon theoretical grounds and upon certain experimental facts, the hernatogenous theory seems more plausible. No definite conclusions can be drawn from the last series of experiments. From this limited study it seems probable that lobar pneumonic processes are produced less easily after intravenous injection of various cocci and insufflation of irritating substances than by-similar treatment with Friedlnder's bacillus.
1. Blood glycolysis in vitro during a period of three hours' incubation proceeds at practically the same rate under sterile conditions and when no effort is made to prevent contamination. 2. Fresh thyroid extract, adrenalin, and phlorhizin do not contain any substances which have a constant effect upon the rate of blood glycolysis outside of the body. No evidence of the presence of an antiferment was found.
Lactose does not increase the receptivity of mice and rats for the transplantable carcinomata of their species.
1. Metchnikoff and Besredka's living sensitized vaccine produces a typhoid cholecystitis when injected directly into the gall bladder of rabbits. It is therefore infectious. 2. Rabbits cannot be successfully immunized with this vaccine against direct gall bladder infections. Accordingly, rabbits cannot be used to test immunity in this way. 3. The strain used in the Army vaccine is pathogenic, relatively avirulent, and distinctly toxic. Its efficacy is believed to depend on its toxicity. 4. Vaccinations in those who have had typhoid and revaccinations produce more severe local reactions than original vaccinations in some instances. 5. The typhoidin skin test is not believed to be an index of true immunity, but rather an indication of typhoid proteid sensitization, which is not so complete, so permanent, or so specific as true immunity.
Such foreign proteins as horse serum and egg-white in the amounts employed in these experiments do not produce evidences of intoxication immediately after injection into rabbits. Single large injections do, however, produce changes in the parenchymatous organs after a period often to twenty-one days. These develop at the time or immediately after the animal has formed antibodies for the foreign proteins. The mechanism of the development of the lesions in the myocardium, liver, and kidneys of rabbits is thus the same, whether a single inoculation is given or whether repeated inoculations are made in sensitized animals. By the latter method, however, much more marked and extensive changes may be produced.
1. At least three subgroups of Pneumococcus Type II may be recognized by specific immune reactions. They have been called Subgroups II A, II B, and II X. 2. That the organisms of these three subgroups are biologically related to Pneumococcus Type II is shown by the following facts: (a) Agglutination with Antipneumococcus Serum II. (b) Protection with Antipneumococcus Serum II, except Subgroup II X. (c) Absorption of Antipneumococcus Serum II with typical Type II pneumococcus removes the antibodies for all subgroups, (d) Absorption of Antipneumococcus Serum II with a member of Subgroups II A or II B removes only the antibodies for the homologous subgroup. Absorption of Antipneumococcus Serum II with any given member of Subgroup II X removes the antibodies for that particular strain only. 3. That the three subgroups, although biologically related to Pneumococcus Type II, possess, nevertheless, specific differential characterswhich separate them one from another, is evidenced by thefollowing facts: (a) The organisms of any subgroup are not agglutinated bythe antisera of the other two subgroups. (b) They are not protected against by the sera of the other subgroups. (c) They do not absorb from Antipneumococcus Serum II the specific immune bodies of the other subgroups. 4. Subgroups II A and II B are characterized by immunity reactions identical within the respective group. 5. Subgroup II X consists of heterogeneous strains which do not cross in their immunity reaction with each other or with Subgroups II A or II B.
1. The spontaneous occurrence of myeloid leukemia of the fowl is confirmed 2. Myeloid leukemia of the fowl is transmissible by intravenous or intraperitoneal injection of an organic emulsion. The latter is in confirmation of the work of Ellermann and Bang (6, 7), who first successfully transmitted the disease. They were followed by Hirschfeld and Jacoby (13)) whose successful transmissions, however, seem to be limited to a strain which had its origin in a fowl presented to them by Ellermann and Bang. Burckhardt (14, 15) likewise transmitted the disease, but here again the stock animal came from Hirschfeld and Jacoby and therefore indirectly from Ellermann and Bang. The transmission reported above is of special interest, because it originated in an animal absolutely unrelated to that of the previous investigators.
The results here reported confirm those of the former papers and strengthen the conclusions drawn therefrom. They may be summarized as follows: Chicken plasma has a marked bactericidal action on Bacillus typhosus, which may be in some slight degree overcome by the presence of growing tissue, especially splenic tissue, in the cultures. On Bacillus dysenterioe this bactericidal action of chicken plasma is present, but much less marked, and the same counteracting action of tissue, especially splenic tissue, is evident. On Bacillus coli verus chicken plasma has little or no bactericidal action. On Bacterium diphtheriticum chicken plasma has a very strong bactericidal action which may be strongly counteracted by the presence of growing tissue in the cultures. In all cases the bactericidal action of the plasma is decidedly diminished by dilution, as shown by the comparative results of these and the cultures formerly reported. The migrating white cells from splenic cultures, or substances closely associated with these cells, have a distinctly bactericidal influence on all organisms tested except Bacillus coli verus. Murphy states that lymphocytes first appear in the general circulation of the chick embryo on the 18th to 20th day, but in my cultures of splenic tissue cells resembling lymphocytes in morphology and behavior begin to appear in cultures of 11 or 12 day spleen and are abundant in cultures of spleen from 14 day or older embryos.
These results seem to indicate that many bacteria may be utilized by tissue cells as food for growth or may contain a substance or substances stimulating cell growth or multiplication. This substance is stable and is not destroyed by heating to 100 degrees C. or by long standing. With Micrococcus aureus this action is often neutralized or overcome by a substance inhibitory to growth. The nature of these substances has not yet been determined, though several attempts along this line were made by endeavoring to split the typhoid bacterial substance according to the method of Vaughan See PDF for Structure and testing the poisonous and non-poisonous residues separately. However, at the time too little bacterial substance was used to obtain enough end-products to be of much use, and the products so obtained prevented the plasma from coagulating. Even in the uncoagulated plasma there appeared to be an increase of cells in the cultures with the non-poisonous residue. The author hopes to be able to repeat these tests with split products at a later time when more bacterial substance is available, with the hope of obtaining more definite results.
In plasma cultures, with or without tissue, tubercle bacilli form characteristic streptothrix-like colonies of loosely twisted skeins of threads. In plasma tissue cultures embryonal connective tissue and epithelial cells phagocytyze tubercle bacilli freely. Splenic tissue cultures from fourteen day or older embryos if inoculated with isolated bacilli will phagocytyze and prevent the development of all or nearly all bacilli present. If heavy inoculations of tubercle bacilli with many bacillary clumps are made in splenic cultures the bacilli develop more freely than in similar connective tissue cultures from heart tissue in spite of marked phagocytosis. In such cultures the first change seen is a clustering of small round cells, interpreted as lymphocytes, around bacillary clumps and colonies followed by a similar clustering of larger parenchymatous polygonal cells with one or several nuclei, interpreted as epithelioid cells, which phagocytyze any bacilli with which they may come in contact. The larger cells containing bacilli then fuse to form larger multinuclear cells and these by further fusion form typical giant cells with quiescent nuclei in characteristic groupings and bacilli in degenerated protoplasm away from the nuclear groups. Cells which have phagocytyzed bacilli may digest them or may be unable to do so, in which case the bacilli develop within the cells and eventually cause complete cell degeneration.
1. Definite morphological changes occur in the batonnets of the proximal convoluted tubule in stages of activity. 2. Atypical mitochondria but no batonnets exist in the regenerated cells found in chronic uranium nephritis. 3. No secretion of urea occurs in these cells which do not contain the cell organs. 4. The urea is secreted normally in the proximal convoluted tubule only (Leschke). 5. The urea appears in the form of granules, which are arranged in definite rows. 6. It is suggested that the secretion of the urea is by means of the mitochondrial batonnets which act as condensors.
We believe that our experiments have shown that the serum of rabbits and sheep immunized with cultures of Treponema pallidum acquires spirochaeticidal properties for these culture spirochaetes. The normal serum of these animals also possesses spirochaeticidal action if used in sufficient quantities, and the action of the immune serum represents probably an increase of the antibodies normally present. Both normal and immune spirochaeticidal properties are destroyed by heating to 56 degrees C. The spirochaeticidal action of the immune serum can be reactivated by the addition of fresh normal serum of the same species, insufficient in amount to exert a spirochaeticidal effect by itself. The structure of these spirochaeticidal bodies, therefore, is entirely analogous to that of the well known bactericidal antibodies known to exist in antibacterial sera. We do not wish to have these results interpreted as applying to virulent spirochaetes as well as to culture spirochaetes. A subsequent publication will demonstrate why we specify this at present.
1. As regards these strains, at least, there is no consistent change, either increase or decrease, of rabbit pathogenicity during progressive rabbit passage. 2. There is no difference in pathogenicity between these different strains, although some of them were isolated from condylomata, some from chancres, one from a mucous patch, and one by Nichols from the nervous system. 3. We do not believe that there is any consistency of difference in speed of incubation between these various strains. 4. We think that the nature of the lesion produced by any individual strain, and the incubation time as well, are dependent upon the fortuitous factors incident to the nature of the material used, the technique of injection, and the size of rabbit in which the injection is made. As to the tendency to generalize possessed by one strain or another, we are not prepared to make a statement. We have not inspected as carefully as we might all our rabbits in regard to the more obscure syphilitic lesions such as small nodules on the eyebrows, nodules on the nasal bones, and internal lesions of the eye. As a matter of fact, we have noticed three cases of keratitis, probably syphilitic, and a number of preputial metastases, we have seen occasional nodules about the anus, and in one case a peritonitis in the fluid of which living treponemata were found on examination. There has not been in our series an extensive number of generalizations. We attribute this largely to the fact that all the studies here recorded were made on rabbits intratesticularly inoculated. It appears from the writings of other investigators that intravenous and intracardial injection of rabbits leads to a more extensive metastatic or general distribution. Two of the few rabbits inoculated intravenously showed testicular lesions. A series of rabbits intracerebrally inoculated through trephine openings showed nothing definite on autopsy, though one of them showed interference with reflexes and rigidity of the limbs for a time which seemed significant of pathological change. This rabbit, however, recovered entirely.
Although antibodies can be produced by the immunization of animals with cultivated Treponema pallidum, and although these antibodies exert specific agglutinative and treponemicidal action upon the culture organisms, they possess, at least in the concentration so far obtained by us in rabbits and sheep, practically no action for virulent treponemata obtained directly from lesions. There seems to be in the infected body an inability to exert a purely serum action upon the virulent treponemata, a condition of affairs which may well lead to a lack of antigen absorption on the part of the body and a consequent failure to produce serum antibodies. We do not think that this should in any way discourage our further investigation of the protective action of antibodies produced with culture pallida. On the one hand, the slight occasional agglutination and the lower proportion of takes with the concentrated serum in the last experiment at least indicate the possibility that we have been working with sera that are not sufficiently powerful and that just as with work with the pneumococcus and other highly invasive organisms, a serum of considerable antibody contents must be used before results can be expected. Again, the destruction of treponemata and the healing of lesions which undoubtedly takes place in rabbits, sometimes with surprising speed, may be a cellular destruction, and by injecting the sera either locally or intravenously and giving them time to be absorbed by the cells before injecting virulent material, better results may be obtained. This direction of research as well as further studies on the antagonistic cellular processes against the pallida, the immunization of animals with killed virulent organisms, and the antibodies in rabbits and human beings during the course of infection and after recovery are being investigated, and we hope to be able to report upon them in the near future.
Cats injected into the parotid gland and testicle with a bacterial sterile filtrate of the salivary secretion of children in the active stage of parotitis or mumps can be made to develop a pathological condition having several points of resemblance to the condition present in mumps in human beings. After an incubation stage of from five to eight days definite changes have been noted in the temperature, blood leukocytes, and inoculated organs. The temperature rise begins within twenty-four hours of the inoculations and reaches a maximum in from seven to fourteen days. The febrile rise fluctuates between 1 degrees and 2.5 degrees C. The white blood cells begin to increase on the second day following the inoculation. The first change is a polymorphonuclear leukocytosis which precedes the glandular swellings. This initial rise is followed by a decline, after which the lymphocytes increase. The increase is confined to the small lymphocytes, which increase to from 7 to 10 per cent of their initial number. The inoculated glands become swollen and tender. The swelling and tenderness become apparent from the fifth to the ninth days and persist for a variable period. The parotid changes are less constant or less obvious than are the testicular. The latter are constant and endure from eight to twelve days. The rise of temperature and the leukocytosis precede the glandular swelling, but all the changes reach the maximum at about the same time, after which they decline gradually. What may be regarded as normal conditions are reestablished in four weeks or less. The intraparotid and intratesticular injections of extracts of normal parotid gland and testicles may cause a mild rise of temperature and leukocytosis of brief duration, but swelling and tenderness are absent. The white cells increased are the polymorphonuclears and not the lymphocytes. The intraparotid and intratesticular injections of filtrates of normal saliva may cause a mild rise of temperature of very brief duration, but leukocytosis, swelling, and tenderness do not appear. The histological changes in the parotid gland when present consist chiefly of edema of the interlobular connective tissue with mononuclear interstitial infiltration about the ducts and elsewhere. In cases of long duration the ducts may be dilated. But in some instances the swollen gland while showing congestion and edema in gross showed inconspicuous changes under the microscope. The histological changes in the testicle are of two kinds: inconstant changes of cellular invasion between the tubules and swelling or even multiplication of the interstitial cells, constant ones consisting of degeneration of the epithelium and interference with spermatogenesis, a condition to which we have applied the term "spermatorrhexis." The pathological conditions set up by the filtrate derived from the salivary secretion of cases of acute parotitis are intensified by successive transfers through a small series of cats of the extract and emulsion of the parotid gland and testicle previously inoculated. The pathological changes are also prevented or reduced when the extract or emulsion is previously incubated with a quantity of blood serum obtained from a cat which has survived inoculation. Normal serum, on the other hand, has no such inhibiting effect. The deduction from these experiments is to the effect that the salivary secretion in parotitis or mumps contains a filterable substance capable of setting up a series of definite pathological conditions when inoculated into the testicle and parotid glands of cats. Whether this active material is a microorganism and if so whether it is the specific microbic cause of parotitis or mumps remains to be ascertained.
Potent antimeningitis serum can be safely produced in the horse by the method of three successive intravenous inoculations of living meningococci and parameningococci repeated at stated intervals. Sudden and alarming symptoms and sudden death are avoided by employing first a desensitizing injection and then by adjusting the doses according to the febrile reaction and by making the highly diluted injections slowly. Horses undergoing this process of immunization remain in good condition and may even gain in weight. Specific immune bodies appear in the serum early and rise rapidly. By inoculating alternately several strains of living meningococci and parameningococci, and the autolyzed products of each, a polyvalent serum of high titer can be produced in 8 to 12 weeks instead of in the 10 months required by the subcutaneous method. The serum produced by this rapid method has been employed therapeutically in America, England, France, and some other countries. It is highly desirable to isolate meningococci from many sources and test the strains against the polyvalent serum. Strains which are not agglutinated in high dilution in such a serum should be included subsequently in the lot of strains used for immunization.
The subcutaneous, intraperitoneal, or intravenous inoculation of cultures of typhoid bacilli did not cause, as far as could be determined, a decrease in the antibody content of the blood serum of the rabbit. On the other hand, the intravenous inoculation of typhoid bacilli causes a rapid mobilization of normal antibodies, thus increasing their concentration in the blood, to be followed somewhat later, as in the other forms of inoculation, by the production of so called acquired antibodies. No such condition as the negative phase of Wright was discovered, although especially looked for in the experiments.
We have found in the kidneys of twelve supposedly normal guinea pigs, coming from Pennsylvania and New Jersey, a parasite that closely resembles in some of its phases Klossiella muris, described by Smith and Johnson, and the renal parasite of two West African guinea pigs, described by Seidelin. The forms most commonly found by us and described as the sporoblast cycle, are evidently similar to those described by Smith and Johnson and by Seidelin. There are certain discrepancies of measurement between the parasite described by Seidelin and the one here described, but the most important difference between the two is the different number of sporozoites resulting from a final division of the daughter sporoblasts. Seidelin has found thirty sporozoites; we have found from eight to twelve, while the usual number is eight. Further, we have found a ring form which is unlike any of the stages in either the sporoblast or schizogonic cycle, and which we interpret tentatively as the male element or microgamete. In addition, we have found a tubular form which resembles the glomerular body of Klossiella muris and which we think is the schizogonic phase of this parasite.
1. The processes of repair in the kidneys of guinea pigs after sublethal doses of certain arsenical compounds indicate that all arsenicals do not produce a purely vascular type of renal injury. 2. While some arsenicals produce a predominantly vascular injury and others produce a predominantly tubular injury, both these tissue elements are undoubtedly always affected, although in varying proportion. In addition, the interstitial connective tissue is probably always affected. The diffuse proliferation of this tissue may be relatively conspicuous in the processes of repair after arsenicals that cause but slight vascular injury. 3. All red kidneys do not necessarily show identical pictures during the processes of repair; the same is true of pale kidneys. 4. The mode of action of an arsenical compound as a renal toxic agent is bound up with the chemical constitution of the compound.
The poliomyelitic virus obtained from an experimental monkey has been passed through eight generations in rabbits. It shows no signs of dying out. On the other hand, it gives no evidence of becoming more pathogenic to the species through successive passage. The period of incubation remains variable and the percentage of takes has not increased. Whether eventually a virus can be obtained which is of heightened virulence to rabbits is problematic. All inoculations are by no means successful. The animals show great individual differences in susceptibility to the virus, as is evidenced by the fact that out of fifty-four rabbits inoculated, only twenty-two, or about 40 per cent, succumbed. This fact may explain the negative results of other investigators. At several points in the series of experiments it was thought that the strain had died out. As many as six rabbits have been inoculated one after the other before the virus would catch again. The age of the rabbits is important in considering the susceptibility. From the limited data at our command, adult rabbits are resistant, and there appears to be an abrupt increase in resistance between the age of 6 and 8 weeks; that is, rabbits under 6 weeks are more susceptible to the virus. There seems to be a parallel between the age incidence of this disease in rabbits and spontaneous poliomyelitis in man. The age incidence of poliomyelitis in man is indicated by the term "infantile paralysis." Several methods of inoculation have proved successful; thus the rabbits have succumbed as a result of introducing the virus directly into the brain, by injecting it into a peripheral nerve, or directly into the circulation, or by placing it upon the uninjured nasal mucosa. The symptoms produced show more or less departure from the symptoms of poliomyelitis as seen in the spontaneous disease in man and in the experimental disease in the monkey. There are two distinct pictures recognizable. In one there is paralysis of one or more of the extremities which progresses until death, resembling somewhat the symptoms of the experimental disease in the monkey. This we have designated the progressive type. The other group is included in what we have called the fulminating type. The symptoms are explosive in character, with extreme weakness amounting to prostration, terminating in death in a few hours, attendant upon respiratory failure. The mode of inoculation seems to have little effect upon the type of symptoms produced. The period of incubation is variable and apparently does not depend upon the method of inoculation. The period varied from 2 to 41 days, with an average of 12 days. The two extremes both occurred after intracranial injection. After intranasal insufflation the incubation period was short, being in each case 2 days, followed by symptoms of the fulminating type. The placing of the virus into the nose seems to be an effective method, but is as uncertain as other routes, as only three out of nine rabbits tested in this manner succumbed. The disease produced by this route was particularly virulent. The virus shows no tendency to become fixed. The period of incubation is as variable in the eighth generation as in the first, and the virus has shown no tendency towards increasing virulence through successive passage, in these respects differing from the virus of rabies. We have found the virus to be filterable. An emulsion of the central nervous matter of a rabbit of the first generation passed through a Berkefeld filter, and injected intracerebrally into another rabbit, resulted in death, preceded by symptoms of the fulminating type. Virus (unfiltered) from this rabbit was transferred successfully to two other rabbits. The lesions, while definite and consistent throughout the series, lack the distinctive features of the pathologic picture of poliomyelitis in man and the monkey. Capillary congestion, punctate hemorrhages, degeneration of the motor cells, satellitosis, and more or less cellular infiltration of the gray matter of the cord and medulla are found, but perivascular infiltration is absent and the infiltrating cells are not lymphocytic in character. One of the most striking features of this investigation is the way in which rabbits and monkeys react to the same virus. The disease in the rabbit presents certain clinical resemblances to the experimental disease in the monkey and also to the spontaneous disease in children. On the other hand, the symptoms show marked variation from those seen in the monkey and in man. The picture has not the same constancy in rabbits and could not in most cases be recognized clinically as poliomyelitis. There are still more marked differences in the pathology. While it is true that the brunt of the attack in the rabbit falls upon the gray matter of the cord and medulla, the appearance of the lesions under the microscope shows such differences from the lesions of experimental poliomyelitis in monkeys, as well as the natural disease in man, as to suggest two distinct infections. It is more reasonable, however, to assume that we are dealing with a modified form of poliomyelitis; that the rabbit reacts differently to the virus than the monkey or man; and that the disease produced in rabbits by us and others is in fact poliomyelitis. So far as we know, no other virus produces such differences in two animal species. Smallpox is so profoundly altered in the cow that it took almost 100 years to prove Jenner's assumption that cowpox is a modified form of smallpox. However, the pock of vaccinia is a correct counterpart both clinically and pathologically of the pock of variola. If the virus of poliomyelitis may be so altered in the rabbit as scarcely to be recognizable, may it not be still more profoundly changed in other animals? The conjecture then arises that poliomyelitis, instead of being limited naturally to man and experimentally to monkeys, may in fact occur in other animals in unnoticed or unrecognized form. If this should prove true, it may be a source of human infection and may help to solve the problem of prevention.
The problem of eradicating ovarian infection in the domestic fowl assumes still greater importance than heretofore, in the light of data recently acquired. Not only is it of great significance to eliminate the permanent carriers of Bacterium pullorum from all flocks of fowls from the standpoint of successful poultry breeding, but also because they constitute a possible source of danger to man. Eggs which harbor Bacterium pullorum in the yolk in large numbers may produce abnormal conditions, when fed, not only in young chicks, but in adult fowls, young rabbits, guinea pigs, and kittens. The toxicity for young rabbits is most pronounced, the infection usually resulting in the death of the animals. In kittens the most prominent symptoms are those of severe food-poisoning with members of the paratyphoid group of bacteria. The possibility of infected eggs causing serious disturbances in young children and in the sick and convalescent of all ages must therefore receive serious consideration. Ovarian infection of fowls is very common throughout this country. Hence, a large proportion of the marketed eggs are infected with Bacterium pullorum. When such eggs are allowed to remain in nests under broody hens, or in warm storage places, for comparatively few hours, they contain large numbers of the organism. Soft boiling, coddling, and frying on one side only do not necessarily render the yolks free from viable bacteria; therefore, eggs which have gone through these processes may, like raw eggs, be the cause of serious disturbances in persons who are particularly susceptible to such influences, and especially to infants. That no well authenticated instances of egg-poisoning of this kind are on record does not warrant the assumption that there have been no cases. The etiology of infantile stomach and intestinal disturbances is as yet too little understood; in fact, it may be said that many of these disorders have no known cause, and almost as much may be said regarding gastro-intestinal diseases in later life. Furthermore, since the ailments caused by infected eggs would not make themselves felt presumably until several days after their ingestion, little or no suspicion would fall upon the eggs. It may be said, too, that the wide distribution of ovarian infection in the domestic fowl has come about only in the last few years, hence its possible danger to man is one of recent development.
1. The serum changes observed during acute experimental pancreatitis indicate that the shock and death are due to an intoxication from protein split products, and not to an intoxication from pure tryptic ferment. 2. When the pancreatitis is produced by the injection of an anti-proteolytic substance (sodium oleate), the degree of intoxication bears no relation to the degree of tissue destruction. 3. The increase in serum antiferment apparently favors the recovery of the animal.
1. In thyroparathyroidectomized dogs the onset of tetany bears no constant relation to the ferment-antiferment balance of the serum. 2. The serum lipase titer remains at a low level throughout. 3. A progressive increase in non-coagulable nitrogen and proteoses is observed in the serum following the removal of the glands. 4. The amino nitrogen of the serum is usually increased at the time when tetany is most marked.
1. As has been found by other investigators, when a large amount of dextrose is injected intravenously into a normal dog it disappears from the circulating blood in about 90 minutes after the end of the injection. Varying amounts (an average of 60 per cent) are excreted in the urine. 2. Even in nephrectomized animals the same quantity will leave the circulation in the same length of time as in normal animals. 3. This phenomenon seems to be, at least to a great extent, independent of vital processes, since dextrose, after intravenous injection into dead animals, is found to leave the blood rapidly. 4. The phenomenon is independent of the important abdominal organs, for it also occurs in animals (living or dead) in which the aorta and inferior vena cava have been ligated near the diaphragm, thus abolishing most of the circulation posterior to the diaphragm. 5. The fact that a considerable amount of the sugar passes from the circulation into the surrounding tissues was established by finding an increase in the carbohydrates of the muscle tissue. This was done in the case of the living anterior animals and in the whole and anterior dead animals. In most of these experiments there was also evidence of the formation of polysaccharides in the muscle tissue.
1. By means of vascular suture it is possible to remove the dog's kidney from the body and later to restore it to its former position. 2. Such a kidney is removed from the control of the nervous system, at least for a time. 3. Examination of the function of a kidney so treated shows an initial period of overaction, as compared with that of the normal kidney. 4. This is followed by balanced action. 5. The more recent tests of renal function show that a single, reimplanted kidney is able to maintain normal life indefinitely. 6. The results of these experiments, together with the evidence already at hand, suggest strongly that secretory nerves to the kidney do not exist.
Individual, living, tissue cells can be obtained in suspension by digesting with trypsin the clot of growing tissue cultures. Under these circumstances the living cells assume a spherical form. When washed and plated in fresh plasma they put out processes and proliferate. After growth in the new plates has occurred the digestion and plating can be repeated. The limits of the method have not yet been reached. We are at work on a number of the problems which it has opened up.
Pure cultures of the spirochaetal causative agent of the disease known as Weil's disease, or febrile icterus, in Japan, have been obtained by us in a solid, a semisolid, and a fluid medium. The spirochaeta thus isolated remains pathogenic for guinea pigs for many generations. Up to the present time we have succeeded through the courtesy of Professor Nagayo, Dr. Konuma, and Dr. Ishihara, in cultivating three different strains. The spirochaeta is a facultative anaerobe. The solid and semisolid culture media possess one disadvantage, in that they are opaque on account of the addition of red blood corpuscles; but it is hoped that this drawback may soon be overcome by further studies. We shall report later the results of investigations regarding various questions in immunity as well as further details regarding the biological properties of the spirochaeta.
By the addition of substituted benzyl halides to hexamethylenetetramine, a series of quaternary salts of this base was obtained. These salts represent a new group of organic bactericides. The results obtained in the tests with these substances upon Bacillus typhosus have demonstrated the existence of direct relationships between chemical constitution and bactericidal action within the series. The bactericidal character is directly attributable to the presence of the hexamethylenetetramine nucleus. The degree of the bactericidal action, however, is determined by the position, character, and number of the groups substituted in the benzene nucleus. By the introduction of the methyl, chlorine, bromine, iodine, cyano, and nitro groups into the benzene nucleus of the parent benzyl hexamethylenetetraminium salt, the bactericidal power of this compound was notably enhanced. The substitution of these groups in the ortho position almost invariably resulted in substances which were more active than their meta or para isomers. The introduction of the methoxy group was without marked effect. Several substances in which two hexamethylenetetraminium side-chains occurred were found to be the most active of the substances of this series when tested against Bacillus typhosus. Comparative tests with other bacterial types demonstrated that these compounds possessed a marked degree of specificity for Bacillus typhosus.
The extension of the study of the quaternary salts of hexamethylenetetramine to those obtained by the addition of this base to the most varied types of substances containing aliphatically bound halogen has demonstrated that the introduction of the hexamethylenetetramine nucleus in this manner results in the production of bactericidal substances or enhances the bactericidal action if already present. In particular it was found possible by the use of the halogenacetyl group, XCH(2)CO, as a connecting link, to furnish primary and secondary aliphatic and aromatic amines, alcohols, and hydrocarbons of the most varied character with the hexamethylenetetramine molecule and to study the relation between chemical constitution and bactericidal action in the series of substances so prepared. Because of the variety of chemical types studied, the results are too involved for a detailed summary here. Many of the substances were found to be very powerful bactericides, and in a number of instances derivatives of purely aliphatic nature were found to possess an unusual bactericidal power. Bacillus typhosus, streptococcus, meningococcus, and gonococcus were the microorganisms used for the tests, and striking instances of partial specificity were observed. This specificity was found to favor not one species alone, but instances were found in which each of the types of bacilli was shown to be especially susceptible to one or another of the particular types of compound employed. The source of this partial specificity is to be sought not in the hexamethylenetetramine nucleus itself but in the molecule to which it is attached. The action of some of the substances was tested in the presence of serum or protein and was found to be not at all or only slightly inhibited. In other cases marked inhibition occurred. The factors controlling the serum- or protein-compatibility of these substances are likewise to be sought in that portion of the molecule other than the hexamethylenetetramine.
1. Living phagocytes are able to protect ingested organisms from the action of destructive substances in the surrounding fluid, and even from a strong homologous antiserum. 2. There is evidence that the protection by phagocytes is largely if not entirely conditioned on their being alive. 3. These facts should be taken into consideration in the study of diseases caused by infectious agents capable of living within tissue cells.
Digitalis was given by mouth to five normal young male adults in amounts ranging from 2.0 to 3.0 gm. of standardized leaves in the course of 7 to 10 days. The As-Vs interval was prolonged in four of the five subjects, the greatest prolongation occurring in the case of the subject who received the most digitalis and none at all in one who received only 2.0 gm. There was no prolongation to so great an interval as 0.2 second until 2.7 gm. had been taken. The effects of the digitalis on conduction time began 5 to 6 days after the drug had been started and after 1.5 to 1.8 gm. had been taken. The effects persisted for 1 to 2 weeks after the drug had been stopped. Atropine removed completely the effect of digitalis on A-V conduction. The slowing heart rate after exercise was accompanied by an enhancement of the defect in conduction. The change in conduction through digitalis was therefore almost entirely, if not entirely, due to increase of vagal tone and irritability. Digitalis did not affect to an appreciable extent the Q-end of S and the Q-end of T intervals. Exercise and atropine both shortened the ventricular complex Q-end of T while the subject was under digitalis. The amplitude of the T wave, especially in Lead II, was changed within 48 hours after digitalis had been started, a decrease then beginning which became greater as the drug was continued and which persisted until 10 to 19 days after the digitalis had been stopped. The change in the T deflection preceded by several days the change in conduction time. The T wave, therefore, in the normal subject as well as in the patient gives us the earliest indication of digitalis action. The amplitudes of P, Q, R, and S were not materially influenced by the amounts of digitalis given. The pulse rate in two subjects became lower than usual at night as the result of the digitalis; otherwise there was no evidence of vagal action on the sino-auricular node. Blood pressure was uninfluenced by the digitalis. Mild subjective sensations occurred in all the subjects during the administration of the drug. A curious, hitherto undescribed, digitalis arrhythmia consisting of blocked auricular premature beats occurred in one subject after 3.0 gm. of digitalis had been taken.
1. The hypodermic administration of tethelin increases markedly the rate of growth of the primary tumor and the tendency to form metastases in rats inoculated with carcinoma, in this, as in other respects, reproducing the action of the whole anterior lobe of the pituitary body. 2. Other alcohol-soluble extractives of the anterior lobe of the pituitary body, with the exception of the lecithin fraction, exert no appreciable effect upon the growth of carcinomata in rats. 3. The lecithin fraction, as in previously reported experiments in which we employed lecithin obtained from eggs, causes evident retardation of the growth of carcinomata in rats.
These experiments justify the following general conclusions. By the intravenous injection of M/4 magnesium sulphate into dogs at a certain rate, a stage can be reached where the abdominal walls are completely relaxed and when section of the abdomen and stimulation of sensitive parts of the parietal peritoneum do not produce pain or elicit any reaction of the animal. At the same time spontaneous respiration may still be maintained within normal limits and the lid reflex be fair or even normal. In this stage intratracheal intubation for artificial respiration can be easily accomplished. This stage may be attained in 12 to 14 minutes when the rate of injection is about 3 cc. per minute. When this stage is once attained the rate of injection should gradually be reduced, otherwise, sooner or later, spontaneous respiration will be abolished, and by a further maintenance of the rate of injection all the skeletal muscles may become paralyzed. When the injection of magnesium is continued for a longer period, the paralytic effects of the magnesium injection will set in, even when administered at a slow rate. The paralysis of the respiratory function is readily met by intrapharyngeal insufflation, which is easily executed even without training in this procedure, or by the method of intratracheal insufflation, if executed by one trained in its management. When the respiration of the animal is accomplished by insufflation, the paralytic effect of the magnesium may be abolished fairly rapidly by an intravenous injection of about 10 cc. of an M/8 calcium chloride solution; or it may disappear slowly, after the infusion of the magnesium solution is discontinued for some time. The latter mode of disappearance may be favorably accelerated by an intravenous infusion of 60 to 100 cc. of an M/4 solution of sodium sulphate. The production of anesthesia by intravenous injection of magnesium sulphate should not be undertaken unless an apparatus for intrapharyngeal insufflation is at hand, because in exceptional cases the disappearance of spontaneous respiration may be one of the earliest consequences of the magnesium injection. The injection of calcium chloride should not be employed in cases in which the subject shows cardiac insufficiency. In such instances, moreover, injections of magnesium should not be used for the purpose of anesthesia; at least not until greater experience has been acquired in the employment of this method.
The foregoing experiments establish firmly the following facts. Subcutaneous or intramuscular injections of sodium oxalate in subtoxic doses, when administered to an animal which received a subminimal dose of magnesium sulphate, produce profound anesthesia and paralysis of long duration, although the usual effects of sodium oxalate alone are of a stimulating character. This fact is, in general, in harmony with the results reported by Starkenstein who, however, seems to have used the combination of the two salts in one solution; namely, that of magnesium oxalate. The combined injections of subminimal doses of sodium oxalate and magnesium sulphate produce a strong reduction, or even, at times, a complete abolition of the conductivity of the motor nerve endings. An intravenous injection of calcium salts brings on a recovery from the profound and prolonged effects of the combined action of sodium oxalate and magnesium sulphate, which is as prompt as is observed in experiments in which effective doses of magnesium alone were given. This fact is the more noteworthy, since depressions of long duration produced by prolonged continuous injections of magnesium solutions alone do not respond very promptly and effectively to calcium injections. As will be recalled, the starting point for our investigation was the hypothesis that substances which are capable of precipitating calcium-a biological antagonist of magnesium-ought to be capable of increasing the depressive effect of magnesium. Our experiments proved that this assumption was correct. This would seem, therefore, to justify the interpretation that the augmenting action of sodium oxalate has its cause in the ability of the latter to precipitate calcium and thus increase within the body the amount of unantagonized magnesium. However, we wish to state expressly that this view is, for the present, still no more than a hypothesis and does not exclude other possible interpretations of our facts. As we pointed out it speaks against this hypothesis that oxalates do not produce phenomena of depression; the toxic symptoms produced by oxalates exhibit distinctly signs of increased and not of decreased irritability.
In as far as the observations reported have a bearing on the movements of fluid within the eye, they are, for the most part, in accord with views at present generally accepted. On the other hand, we know of no other way in which it may be so readily demonstrated that simple and even temporary local circulatory changes may profoundly alter the distribution of substances from the circulating blood to the extravascular fluids and tissues. In the light of these observations, it would seem that such changes might easily account for marked idiosyncrasies in the action of poisonous drugs, and as well probably for other factors in drug action.
The pressor substance of the hypophysis is so marked in the pig fetus measuring 175 mm. that it seems probable that a fetus of this length is independent of the secretion of the mother's hypophysis.
Claims of efficiency have been made at two widely separated periods for the chemical treatment of epidemic meningitis, in the first instance for lysol and in the second for protargol. The use of lysol was long since abandoned; the recommendation for protargol is based on a single series of cases, small in number. Because of the variable severity of epidemics of meningitis, small reliance can be placed on results of treatment limited in extent to small numbers of cases and to one locality. A more uniform and accurate measure of the value of a method of treatment is provided by animals infected experimentally with pathogenic cultures of meningococci. Young guinea pigs respond in a definite manner to intraperitoneal inoculation of virulent meningococci. Neither protargol nor lysol proved to have any curative action on the experimental infection thus produced in these animals. Monkeys respond in a characteristic manner to the inoculation of virulent cultures into the subarachnoid space. Protargol displayed no curative action on the experimental infection thus produced in these animals. On the contrary, both lysol and protargol exert antileukotactic and antiphagocytic effects, and are also potent protoplasmic poisons, and the leukocytes with which they come in contact are injured and made to degenerate. According to the extent to which these harmful properties are exerted, the chemicals promote the advance rather than restrain the progress of meningococcic infection. Recovery from meningococcic infection in man and animals is accomplished chiefly through the process of phagocytosis. The specific antiserum acts curatively by increasing the emigration of leukocytes, by promoting phagocytosis directly, and by agglutinating the meningococci, and also by neutralizing endotoxin. Any means which interfere with and reduce these essential processes retard or prevent recovery. Both lysol and protargol interfere with and diminish the emigration of leukocytes and the phagocytosis of meningococci, and neither possesses antitoxic power. The mixture of antiserum with lysol and with protargol reduces to a certain extent the antileukotactic and antiphagocytic effect of the chemicals; but this action is insufficient to set aside wholly the injurious effects which they produce. It follows, therefore, that whatever theoretical advantages might accrue from a bactericidal activity exerted by these chemicals independently of the type of meningococcus causing epidemic meningitis, is more than offset by the harmful effects which they cause. Hence specific antiserum seems to provide the logical therapeutic agent with which to combat epidemic meningitis, since it is itself innocuous and promotes those processes essential to recovery from the disease. The problem up to the present has been that of producing an antiserum which represents the several types of the meningococcus, and this problem is now in a fair way to being solved.
Since a knowledge of the susceptibility of any species of Anopheles to infection with malaria parasites is of great importance in determining its part in the transmission of malaria, the experiments reported here were undertaken, and included the three most prevalent species of this genus occurring in the United States. As a result of these experiments Anopheles punctipennis is shown to be an efficient host of the organisms of tertian and estivo-autumnal malaria, Anopheles crucians of estivo-autumnal malaria, at least, and information has been obtained upon the relative susceptibility of these two species and Anopheles quadrimaculatus. The latter species has been known to be an efficient host since Thayer's experiments in 1900, and has been considered to be the principal species concerned in the transmission of malaria in the United States. With Anopheles punctipennis, developmental forms of the exogenous or sporogenic cycle of Plasmodium vivax were demonstrated in six (85 per cent) of the seven mosquitoes dissected, and the development of Plasmodium falciparum, in four (20 per cent) of twenty specimens. These four infections, however, occurred in a series of thirteen specimens fed on one person, so that the percentage was actually 33. With Anopheles crucians, oocysts or sporozoites or both oocysts and sporozoites of Plasmodium falciparum were found in nine (75 per cent) of the twelve specimens dissected. No tests were made with this species and Plasmodium vivax. Anopheles quadrimaculatus was employed as a control species in the experiments and became infected in the following ratio: eight (66 per cent) of twelve specimens with Plasmodium vivax, and three (15 per cent) of nineteen specimens with Plasmodium falciparum. In determining the relative susceptibility of the three species only those individuals which had fed upon the same gamete carriers are considered. The number of mosquitoes from which the percentages are computed is too small to make the results entirely conclusive, but the indications are that Anopheles punctipennis and Anopheles quadrimaculatus are equally susceptible to infection with Plasmodium vivax, 85 per cent of each species under the same conditions being positive. With Plasmodium falciparum,Anopheles crucians showed the highest percentage of infection (75 per cent), Anopheles punctipennis second (33 per cent), and Anopheles quadrimaculatus third (23 per cent).
Intestinal obstruction, as a rule, is associated with an increasing amount of non-coagulable nitrogen in the blood. With acute intoxication the rise in non-coagulable nitrogen may be rapid and reach as high as three or even ten times normal. With more chronic intoxication there may be little or no rise in the blood non-coagulable nitrogen. Closed intestinal loops show exactly the same picture, and, when combined with obstruction, may give very high nitrogen readings. Acute proteose intoxication due to injection of a pure proteose will show a prompt rise in blood non-coagulable nitrogen, even an increase of 100 per cent within 3 or 4 hours. These intoxications also show a high blood content of creatinine and urea. The residual or undetermined nitrogen may be very high. A human case of intestinal obstruction with autopsy presents blood findings exactly similar to those observed in many animal experiments. Clinically the non-coagulable nitrogen of the blood may give information of value in intestinal obstruction. A high reading means a grave intoxication, but a low reading may be observed in some fatal cases and gives no assurance that a fatal intoxication may not supervene. The kidneys in practically all these experiments are normal in all respects. It is possible that protein or tissue destruction rather than impaired eliminative function is responsible for the rise in non-coagulable nitrogen of the blood in these acute intoxications. Transfusions of dextrose solutions often benefit intestinal obstruction, and may depress the level of the non-coagulable nitrogen in the blood. Some cases show no change in non-coagulable nitrogen following transfusions and diuresis, and, as a rule, such cases present the most severe intoxication.
1. In experimental wounds, made by removing various sized pieces of skin from the frog, there is a rapid coagulation of the blood plasma and lymph to form a coagulation tissue which fills the wound cavity. 2. The observations on the living animals show that the coagulation a grave intoxication, but a low reading may be observed in some fatal cases and gives no assurance that a fatal intoxication may not supervene. The kidneys in practically all these experiments are normal in all respects. It is possible that protein or tissue destruction rather than impaired eliminative function is responsible for the rise in non-coagulable nitrogen of the blood in these acute intoxications. Transfusions of dextrose solutions often benefit intestinal obstruction, and may depress the level of the non-coagulable nitrogen in the blood. Some cases show no change in non-coagulable nitrogen following transfusions and diuresis, and, as a rule, such cases present the most severe intoxication.
In the preceding pages we have submitted evidence which shows that a simple intratracheal injection of a solution in a normally breathing rabbit penetrates within a few seconds to the alveoli, chiefly those of the left lower lobe; that absorption is rapid and well maintained; and that the procedure may be repeated effectively a number of times even with a substance like adrenalin which decreases absorption. It was also shown that absorption of adrenalin from the lung could be obtained at a time when double the dose given intramuscularly exerted no blood pressure effect whatever, and that absorption could still take place after the development of pulmonary edema, when there was an undoubted dilution of the injected solution with a serum-containing liquid and when a diminution of the absorptive field had occurred. The solution injected, after reaching the alveoli, is probably largely taken up by the capillaries of the pulmonary veins. This is indicated by the great rapidity with which an intratracheal injection of adrenalin may cause a rise of blood pressure. In numerous instances, for example, the pressure began to rise less than 5 seconds after the completion of an injection, equaling and even surpassing in rapidity of effect an intramuscular injection. Absorption by the lymphatics probably plays a secondary part, an assumption rendered all themore likely if we consider that lymph nodes are interpolated in the lymphatic pulmonary path, where the bed of the lymph stream becomes greatly widened and the current slowed. Injection into the lungs, however, offers another advantage due to the vascular arrangement of the absorbing field which could be of value therapeutically. Absorption of liquids injected into the lung probably takes place largely through the capillaries of the pulmonary veins; to a slight extent possibly through the capillaries of the bronchial veins which empty partly into the pulmonary veins, partly into the azygos veins; and probably some absorption occurs also through the lymphatics. By far the larger proportion of the absorbed material will thus be rapidly delivered to the left auricle and then to the left ventricle. At each succeeding systole, as long as absorption continues, a fraction of the drug will be driven into the coronary arteries and be able to affect the musculature of the cardiac pump. This fact ought to render the procedure of intratracheal injection a valuable method when it becomes imperative to stimulate a suddenly failing heart as promptly as possible by drugs of the digitalis group. Intratracheal injection is perhaps better under the conditions mentioned than the intravenous route, for the surface veins cannot always be entered with promptness and certainty even under fairly normal conditions, and in cases of cardiac weakness the difficulties will be measurably increased, while an intratracheal injection can be carried out with ease. Moreover, it is legitimate to expect that some absorption will take place from the lung alveoli as long as the heart-lung circulation persists, no matter how feebly, and that thus some of the drug will reach the heart to act on this structure itself more promptly perhaps than when the drug is administered successfully through surface veins. As far as the intramuscular route is concerned, we have shown that the intratracheal injection of adrenalin gives prompt though diminished absorption at a time when double the dose intramuscularly exerts no blood pressure effect whatever. The technical difficulties of giving an intratracheal injection in animals are slight. Tracheotomy as practised by us in the present series of experiments is not necessary, for the injection may be given into the intact trachea without exposure of the trachea. The hypodermic needle is inserted through the skin about 1 cm. below the larynx in a slanting caudad direction; the entrance of the needle into the trachea is readily felt. The injection should not be so rapid that the injected solution fills the entire tracheal lumen, but it should flow down the sides of the trachea. If the lumen is entirely filled, an expiration may drive some of the injected liquid into the larynx causing cough. In our experiments each injection of about 0.5 cc. consumed approximately 5 seconds. In the human subject no data are available as far as our knowledge goes, but a priori it would seem that an intratracheal injection is almost as simple as in the lower animals. The free hypodermic needle could be inserted into the tracheal lumen immediately below the cricoid cartilage. The needle itself should preferably be connected with the syringe by a short length of rubber tubing to minimize the danger of breaking the needle by a sudden move of the patient. The amount of the solution should not be too small, so that at least a fraction of it may reach the alveoli as promptly as possible; 3 to 5 cc. probably would suffice. Insertion of the needle in the locality mentioned would puncture the isthmus of the thyroid, but this is of no significance, especially when the procedure is employed in cases of cardiac failure where the gravity of the condition would warrant incurring much heavier risks than a slight bleeding from the thyroidal isthmus. In conclusion it may be said that the incorporation of drugs by intratracheal injection, while not as generally applicable as other methods, nevertheless has advantages which warrant its use also in human therapeutics.
The repeated intravenous injection of rabbits with living Bacillus coli communior over long periods has resulted in the formation of amyloid deposits in the spleen, liver, and kidneys. Suppurative lesions were not present in most cases and therefore not a factor in its production. The results have been constant in that amyloid was found in all rabbits, eight in number, which were injected over a period of 88 days or more. Eight rabbits showed amyloid in the spleen, six of these in the kidneys also, and three in the liver. The kidneys of these eight rabbits also showed as a result of the injections a subacute and chronic glomerulitis, parenchymatous degeneration, some interstitial infiltration with round cells, and a slight cellular proliferation of connective tissue, thus resembling the chronic parenchymatous nephritis of man which is so commonly associated with amyloid disease.
It must be assumed that some cause is operative in certain cases preventing the healing of defects in the gastric mucosa and is inoperative in others. Even though anhemolytic streptococci are present in practically all gastric ulcers, we cannot convince ourselves that these organisms have been proven as yet to be the factor which either initiates the ulceration or prevents healing. Nevertheless, the constant presence of streptococci in this type of lesion is a suggestive fact and further experiments to determine their significance are being undertaken.
In a stock culture of the hog-cholera bacillus, which was passed through a series of rabbits 14 years ago, an organism was found that differs from the original culture in that it fails to form gas from the carbohydrates that are usually attacked by this organism, while acid formation persists. This new strain is agglutinated by an anti-hog-cholera bacillus serum and produces in rabbits and mice a disease similar to that caused by the typical cultures. The failure to form gas has persisted over a period of 18 months and all attempts to cause the strain to revert to the original condition have failed. It resembles in many respects Bacillus typhosus and it may be that some of the so called typhoid cultures that are not agglutinated by antityphoid serum are non-gas-producing paratyphoids. Attempts to produce a similar change in a more recently isolated culture of the hog-cholera bacillus by means of animal passages and changes in the environment have been negative.
1. Respiratory infection of rabbits with Bacillus bovisepticus (snuffles) is favored by chilling the animals after they have been accustomed to heat. 2. The character of this disease, which occurs frequently in rabbits under natural conditions, makes the application of the experimental results to similar respiratory conditions in man less open to objection than in similar experiments with other infections. 3. The weight of experimental evidence, including our own, does not justify the elimination of exposure to cold as a possible though secondary factor in the incidence of acute respiratory disease. 4. From the limited data of our last two experiments it is suggested that any marked change of temperature predisposes rabbits to this infection, the severity of which varies with the amount of change, and that a change from low to high temperature has an even more marked effect than that from high to low.
Red corpuscles with nuclei contain heterogeneous sheep antigen when the organs of the same animal possess it. The sera in question contain not only heterogeneous hemolysins but also heterogeneous agglutinins. The hemolytic sera of rabbits immunized with hen red corpuscles are toxic to guinea pigs and kill them, the clinical picture being that of anaphylactic shock. Heterogeneous hemolysins are obtained by means of non-toxic antigen (hen red corpuscles injected into veins of rabbits). This fact refutes the theory of Friedberger, who attributed the antigenic power of a suspension of organs to its toxic character.
The intravenous injection of horse serum, kept for 2 hours at 38 degrees C. in the presence of one-fifth of its volume of a suspension of 0.5 per cent agar in physiological salt solution and then separated from the agar by centrifugalization and filtration, produces in normal rabbits in adequate doses a considerable and prolonged fall in the blood pressure, expulsion of feces, a diminished coagulability in the carotid blood, and at times accelerated respiration; that is, the various symptoms observed after the intravenous injection of horse serum in a seroanaphylactized rabbit. Horse serum previously kept for 30 minutes at 56 degrees C. and then treated with agar in the manner described above, when injected intravenously into a normal rabbit will have no more effect on the arterial pressure, on the intestinal movement, on the respiratory rate, or the coagulation of arterial blood than the introduction of horse serum into the veins of a normal rabbit.
1. A partially occluded artery may dilate distal to the site of constriction. 2. The dilation is circumscribed. 3. When the constriction has been either slight in amount or complete, dilation has not been observed. 4. The dilation was greatest when the lumen of the artery (the aorta) was reduced to one-third or perhaps one-fourth of its original size (Figs. 8 and 11). 5. Dilation or aneurysm of the subclavian artery has been observed twenty-seven or more times in cases of cervical rib. 6. The dilation of the subclavian is circumscribed, is distal to the point of constriction, and strikingly resembles the dilation which we have produced experimentally. 7. The genesis of the experimental dilation and of the subclavian dilation occurring with cervical rib is probably the same. 8. When the lumen of the aorta is considerably constricted the systolic pressure may be permanently so lowered and the diastolic pressure so increased that the pulse pressure is greatly diminished. 9. The experimentally produced dilations and the aneurysms of the subclavian artery in cases of cervical rib are probably not due to vasomotor paralysis, trauma, or sudden variations in blood pressure. 10. The abnormal, whirlpool-like play of the blood in the relatively dead pocket just below the site of the constriction, and the lowered pulse pressure may be the chief factors concerned in the production of the dilations. 11. Intimal surfaces brought, however gently, in contact by bands or ligatures do not, in our experience, unite by first intention, for the force necessary to occlude the artery is sufficient to cause necrosis of the arterial wall. 12. Bands, rolled ever so tightly, do not rupture the intima. 13. The death of the arterial wall having been brought about by the pressure of the band, a gradual substitution of the necrotic tissue takes place, the new vessels penetrating it from both ends. It is, I believe, in this manner that an artery becomes occluded, and it is thus that a fibrous cord forms within the constricting band.
1. The correct interpretation of the form described by Stephens under the name of Plasmodium tenue is as follows: It is not a new species of parasite or an ameboid form, but a parasite attached to the external surface of red corpuscles and distorted by technique. 2. Evidence against a new species of parasite is: (a) they may be found in all known malarial infections and at any stage in the development of the parasite; and (b) they show evidence of distortion. 3. Evidence against ameboid forms and in favor of parasites distorted by technique is: (a) they may be found in but one of the two cover-slips prepared simultaneously; (b) they may be found in certain definite groups in various parts of a film which otherwise contains normal appearing parasites; (c) in rich infections, containing many disforted forms, they may be found in certain parts of a film, all distorted in one direction, the infected corpuscles and those adjacent to them showing no evidence of injury; and (d) two or more parasites attached to one red corpuscle may be seen to be distorted in one direction, or to have nuclei similarly distorted. 4. Three general types of distorted parasites may be recognized: (a) parasites with nuclei distorted and cytoplasm unaltered or but slightly distorted; (b) parasites with cytoplasm distorted and nuclei intact or but little disturbed; and (c) parasites with both nuclei and cytoplasm slightly or markedly distorted. 5. Red corpuscles to which distorted parasites are attached usually appear to be flattened out with slightly irregular outline, but parasites may be more or less distorted without any apparent change in the infected corpuscle. 6. Parasites with well stained chromatin and faded cytoplasm, or parasites with well stained cytoplasm and faded chromatin, may be found in specimens containing well stained parasites. It is usually possible to restain these specimens bringing out the faded cytoplasm belonging to the well stained chromatin or the lost chromatin belonging to the well stained cytoplasm.
Cultures of Streptococcus viridans when brought into contact with red blood corpuscles have the power of transforming oxyhemoglobin into methemoglobin. The reaction occurs only in the presence of living streptococci when they are able to carry on their metabolic activities. The intensity of the reaction runs roughly parallel with the period of growth and multiplication of the bacteria and gradually diminishes and disappears as growth ceases. There is no apparent relation between the activity of a given strain of Streptococcus viridans in producing methemoglobin and its source or virulence. If the streptococci are suspended in salt solution they are unable to change oxyhemoglobin into methemoglobin unless some nutrient substance is present. Of the various nutrient substances tested dextrose is the most efficient in enabling the organisms to bring about the reaction. The reaction does not occur in the absence of oxygen, and is retarded by an excess of oxygen. Substances which tend to reduce the metabolic activities of the bacteria to a minimum exert an inhibitory action on methemoglobin formation. While not definitely proving it to be so, the results obtained in the above experiments strongly support the supposition that the reaction is not due to injurious substances produced by the bacteria or to products arising from the decomposition of the nutrient material present, but rather to the metabolic activities of the bacteria themselves when they are surrounded by environmental conditions which render growth and multiplication possible. The exact chemical nature of the change of oxyhemoglobin to methemoglobin is not known, but it is probably an oxidation process or a combination of reduction and oxidation processes, as pointed out by Heubner. As Cole has shown, the action of aminophenol is of great interest in this connection, in that it acts like a catalytic agent in being able to transform much more hemoglobin into methemoglobin than would be possible if the reaction were a simple molecular one. The metabolic activities of bacteria are largely in the nature of oxidation and reduction processes. The transformation of oxyhemoglobin into methemoglobin by streptococci of the viridans type, therefore, may be analogous to the action of such substances as aminophenol, and the reaction may be due to the active oxidation and reduction processes occurring in the neighborhood of the bacterial cells. The failure of the reaction to occur in the absence of oxygen and its retardation in the presence of an excess of oxygen, both with streptococci and with pneumococci (Cole) would seem to support this theory. Such results, however, may be due to the abnormal conditions surrounding the bacteria with consequent inhibition of their metabolic activities. Cole concluded as the result of his study of methemoglobin formation by pneumococci that since bacteria may injure red blood cells apparently by disturbances in oxidation in the immediate neighborhood of the organisms rather than by the production of a definite toxin, it is possible that bacteria may injure other tissue cells in a like manner and that the pathological effects produced by these bacteria may be explained on this basis. The experimental results recorded above have shown that the formation of methemoglobin by Streptococcus viridans in no way differs from its formation by pneumococci, and they lend support to the theory that bacteria may be injurious to tissues because of the disturbances in oxidation brought about by the metabolic activities of the organisms, especially those associated with growth and multiplication. It is believed that this theory may be particularly applicable to the pathological effects caused by Streptococcus vindans because the lesions produced by it, whether single or multiple, both in man and in experimental animals, are prone to be localized and associated with the actual presence of the streptococci in the lesions.
Acute gastric ulcers are found in a large percentage of animals dying from acute adrenal insufficiency. In dogs in which a portion of the jejunum had been transplanted some time previous to the removal of the adrenals, the gastric mucosa showed more marked changes than the transplanted jejunal mucosa. This tends to show that the gastric juice as the cause of the ulcer is but a secondary although necessary factor.
The results observed with this strain of Treponema pallidum may be stated as follows: 1. Normal human serum did not agglutinate this culture of Treponema pallidum in dilutions of 1:5 or higher; equal parts of treponema culture and normal serum (dilution 1:2) resulted in agglutination in about 50 per cent of the sera. With the strain of Treponema pallidum used in this study specific agglutination was not considered as having occurred unless observed in dilutions of 1:5 or higher. 2. The agglutinating power of the sera of non-syphilitic persons suffering with various infections was not higher than that of normal sera. 3. Traces of specific agglutinin for this culture of Treponema pallidum were found in the sera of persons late in the primary stage of syphilis. 4. In the secondary stage of syphilis about 58 per cent of sera showed the presence of a demonstrable amount of agglutinin in dilutions of 1:5 and higher; in no instance, however, was agglutination in evidence in dilutions higher than 1:20. 5. In tertiary and latent syphilis, mostly infections of the central nervous system, agglutination in dilutions of 1:5 and higher was found with about 84 per cent of sera. The highest concentration of pallida agglutinin in the blood serum was found in the later stages of syphilis. 6. The formation of agglutinin for culture Treponema pallidum in human syphilis is probably tardy and does not reach a state of high concentration. 7. There was no direct relation between the presence of the Wassermann antibody and agglutinin for this strain in the sera of syphilitics. The former appears in the body fluids earlier and is probably in higher concentration in all stages of syphilis; while agglutination is most likely to occur with Wassermann positive sera, it may be occasionally observed with sera yielding negative Wassermann reactions. Likewise strongly Wassermann positive sera may not contain demonstrable amounts of agglutinin. 8. It is probable that different strains of pallida vary in susceptibility to agglutination. For example, in the first investigation on agglutinins for Treponema pallidum by Kolmer, the sera of syphilitics in different stages of the disease did not cause agglutination of one of Noguchi's strains in dilutions of 1:20 and higher, whereas the strain used in the present study was frequently agglutinated in this dilution by sera from a similar group of patients. As shown by Zinsser, Hopkins, and McBurney, virulent pallida from human lesions resist agglutination to a remarkable degree. 9. While further studies are necessary to establish the practical value of agglutination in the diagnosis of human syphilis, we believe that with a suitable culture or cultures well marked agglutination of Treponema pallidum in dilutions of 1:5, or better 1:10 and higher, indicates pallida infection and may prove of value in the diagnosis of isolated cases, particularly in the later stages. Investigations bearing upon the relation of agglutinins for culture pallida to immunity in syphilis will be given in a separate communication (16).
It seems evident from the foregoing experiments that the so called tumors (adenomata) of the thyroid possess the property of taking up iodine and metabolizing it into the active combination in the same way that the non-tumorous thyroid tissue does, although not so readily nor to the same degree, and the action on tadpoles of feeding desiccated tumorous thyroid tissue does not differ qualitatively from feeding desiccated non-tumorous thyroid tissue. The action in either case depends upon the iodine (active iodine) content, and in the case of the adenomata bears no constant relation to the state of their growth or differentiation. Examination of Tables II and III shows that in the main this is true. There are, however, certain discrepancies as to time of death, appearance of first forelegs, degree of emaciation, and rate of growth in certain dishes of the series, the action being not quite parallel to the iodine content. Some of these discrepancies may be explained in part by accidents of feeding, slight differences in size, age) and susceptibility of the different tadpoles receiving the same thyroid, and also by the variations in the amount of thyroid consumed by the different individuals in the same dish. Lenhart has shown that the action of the same thyroid varies with the quantity fed. Another important factor which has to be considered is the condition of the iodine itself. It was suspected at the time of these experiments that the iodine might be present in an active and an inactive form, but no satisfactory proof of this assumption, at the beginning of these experiments, was at hand. Support of this point has been afforded by the work of Kendall on the isolation of the active principle of thyroid and the separation of the iodine into two fractions. Since the completion of our experiments Marine has demonstrated by means of perfusion experiments in vivo and in vitro that iodine is rapidly taken up by the thyroid cells, and though the iodine increase in the perfused lobe may be 1,000 per cent in 2 hours as compared with the control lobe, yet the action on tadpoles is no greater. It then becomes an important question to determine the time required by the thyroid to take up inorganic iodine and manufacture it into the active thyroid principle. It is known that iodine is rapidly taken up by the thyroid, and in man the iodine content of the thyroid is subject to greater variations than in animals on account of the prevalent therapeutic use of iodine and the iodides in goiter and other conditions; even the iodine used in preparing patients for operations would increase the iodine content of the thyroid in a short time, so that one might expect such variations in the action of a given thyroid preparation fed to tadpoles as appear in these experiments. In this connection it is interesting to note (Table II) that Thyroid 20 with 4.31 mg. of iodine was only slightly more active than No. 5 with 1.31 mg. of iodine. Two possibilities have to be considered here. First, No. 20 may have active iodine slightly greater than 1.31 mg. and the balance present as inactive iodine. Second, No. 5 with 1.31 mg. of iodine might represent the maximum possible effect under the conditions of the experiment and a larger quantity of active thyroid iodine could produce no greater effect. Of course with the lower iodine contents the variations in effects might well come within the limits of errors of observation. Also the percentage error would be greater in the iodine determinations, accidents of feeding, etc. Our conclusions as to the effect of feeding desiccated thyroid to tadpoles agree in general with those of Lenhart. The action of the thyroid depends not upon a specific stimulus to differentiation but upon a stimulation of metabolism in general in proportion to the active iodine and the quantity consumed. High iodine contents produce rapid emaciation, at the same time resulting in differentiation even in tadpoles dying in 8 to 12 days. Low iodine contents result in differentiation at an earlier period than the controls. Tadpoles fed on thyroid with practically no iodine grow better than the controls, in this instance the thyroid acting simply as a food. Finally, the interest that the results of these experiments may have in connection with the question of function in tumor tissue should be pointed out. To those who hold that tumor lacks the capacity for physiological function, the adenomata of the thyroid could not be consistently regarded as tumors. To those who hold physiological function as a possible property of tumor tissue, the adenomata might be regarded as tumors. Future studies might warrant a recognition of different grades or degrees of tumor. On this basis the fetal adenoma (very little differentiation) might represent a higher degree of tumor than the diffuse colloid or simple adenomatous thyroid in which the adenomatous nodules are present to a great extent throughout the whole gland and are well differentiated. It is certain that there are all grades and degrees of growth and differentiation in the life history of fetal adenomata of the thyroid, from the pure fetal, undifferentiated adenoma with little or no iodine to the simple or colloid adenoma, well differentiated and with varying amounts of iodine approaching that of normal thyroid.
The picture is one of a true diabetes mellitus, first attracting attention after miscarriage. Although the G : N ratio sank from 3 : 1 on 10 gm. of nitrogen to 1.7 : 1 after 3 days' fasting, the disease progressed steadily in spite of a long continued carbohydrate-free diet. Together with the usual complications of diabetes, a malignant tumor of the thymus developed, so that after 5 months' observations a slow death was forestalled by chloroform. The most striking feature at autopsy was the large, apparently normal pancreas, which exhibited histologically marked changes in the islands of Langerhans, extreme hydropic degeneration and exhaustion of granules, involving both alpha and beta cells, but especially the latter, and replacement of some islands by fibrous tissue.
1. Unmodified human plasma is not a satisfactory culture medium for human tissues owing to the susceptibility of human fibrin to digestion by tissue ferments. The necessary framework is thus destroyed before the cells begin to migrate. The difficulty can be overcome by adding to human plasma or serum a small quantity of fowl or pigeon plasma, the fibrin of which is highly resistant to digestion. Human tissues have been propagated in this medium for several months through subcultures, and growth in vitro can probably be maintained indefinitely. 2. Human tissues show no greater sensitiveness to changes in temperature and mechanical injury associated with preparation of cultures than those of lower animals. They may be preserved in an ordinary ice box at 10-15 degrees C. as long as 6 or 8 days. Tissues obtained at operation give best results, but pieces of organs removed at autopsy 1 to 4 hours after death sometimes show active growth. 3. The presence of normally existing iso-antibodies (agglutinins and hemolysins) in human serum is without influence on the growth of human tissues in vitro. In other words, autogenous serum has no advantage in tissue cultures over homologous serum.
1. Addition of salvarsan to serum in vitro produces a spirocheticidal mixture which is increased in potency by heating. 2. The heated serum of salvarsan-treated patients is more spirocheticidal if it has been in contact with the clot over night than if it has been separated immediately after coagulation. This is not true with the serum from blood which has been salvarsanized in vitro. 3. The addition of salvarsan directly to serum produces a more potent mixture than results from the serum from blood to which salvarsan has been added in equivalent amounts. 4. The increase in activity of salvarsanized serum produced by heating to 56 degrees C. is due in part to the removal of inhibitory substances in the serum and in part to a direct increase in spirocheticidal power in the heated salvarsan. 5. Both salvarsanized and neosalvarsanized serum are rendered more spirocheticidal by heating. 6. A more active spirocheticidal mixture is produced by mixing small amounts of salvarsan with the serum of a salvarsan-treated patient than by mixing the same amount with normal serum.
1. Cultures of Diplococcus pneumoniae, Bacillus coli, Bacillus fluorescens liquefaciens and Bacillus prodigiosus, when grown in meat infusion broth exhibit an initial latent period when the culture used for inoculation is no longer growing at its maximum rate; if, however, the culture is growing at its most rapid rate the bacteria, upon subculture, show no latent period but continue to multiply at the same rate as that of the parent culture. 2. If broth cultures of pneumococcus are centrifuged at the beginning of the period of maximum rate of growth, the bacteria remaining in the supernatant fluid continue to grow at a rapid rate upon further incubation; if, however, the culture is centrifuged at the end of the period of maximum rate of growth, those bacteria which remain in the supernatant fluid show a prolonged latent period, during which many of the organisms die. While the death of these bacteria is taking place the process follows closely the law of unimolecular reactions. 3. Actively growing pneumococci inoculated into the supernatant fluid from a 4 day culture of the same strain continue to grow rapidly for an appreciable time after inoculation. 4. Filtrates from 24 hour cultures of pneumococcus inhibit the further growth of actively growing pneumococci when the latter are inoculated into such filtrates. This inhibitory action of the filtrates is lost in part as the culture from which the filtrate is obtained is allowed to incubate longer. 5. Actively growing pneumococci, after exposure at low temperatures to the action of the filtrate of a 24 hour broth culture of the same strain, show a greater lag than the controls. 6. The foregoing facts offer strong support for the view that lag is an expression of injury which the bacterial cell has sustained from its previous environment.
It is possible to reduce the resistance of guinea pigs to tuberculosis by x-ray exposures, so that when animal inoculation is required for a diagnosis a much quicker result may be had than by the use of normal animals. In renal tuberculosis when it is necessary to resort to the use of animals, it ordinarily requires from 5 to 7 weeks, while by the use of x-rayed guinea pigs the diagnosis can be made in from 8 to 10 days. The resistance can be sufficiently lowered by one massive dose of x-ray administered either shortly before or after the inoculation of the material to be tested. The lesions are so marked in these animals that the diagnosis is certain after the interval indicated above.
1. A method for measuring the area of a wound not geometric in form is described. 2. The rate of cicatrization of a wound is greater at the beginning than at the end of the period of repair. It depends on the area rather than on the age of the wound. There is a constant relation between the size of a wound and the rate of cicatrization. The larger the wound the greater is the rate of cicatrization. Two wounds of different size have a tendency to become equal. 3. The rate is proportional to the area, but diminishes less rapidly than the area. 4. The process of contraction is the more important factor in the repair of a wound. Epidermization completes the work of contraction. After the wound is healed, the cicatrix as a rule expands. 5. The curve representing the diminution of the size of an aseptic wound while it cicatrizes is regular and geometric.
The cicatrization of sterile wounds may be studied in the same way as an ordinary physicochemical phenomenon. It is possible, therefore, to express the law of cicatrization by a mathematical equation as soon as an accurate measure of the wound can be obtained. By means of the equation, a curve is obtained which represents the theoretical evolution of the cicatrization of a wound. This curve, being an expression of what should happen on a normal wound, healing aseptically, on a normal man, is a daily point of comparison to what appears actually on the observed wound, and allows one to study accurately the fluctuations of cicatrization on a given individual, and the action of different dressings and antiseptic substances.
The first article of this series showed that it was possible to express mathematically the phenomenon of cicatrization. The principal point consisted in determining by means of an equation, a constant, or index, characterizing each wound. The calculation had to be made for each patient for each wound, and required two observations, 4 days apart. The index having proved to be a continuous function of the size of the wound and of the age of the patient, of the form See PDF for Equation where S is the area, i the index, a a decimal exponent, and K a constant, it was then possible to draw a chart by means of which this index i could be obtained without calculation. The advantage of the new way of determining the index is, above all, that this index is a general, average, normal index, and no longer an individual index. Hence, the differences between the observed rate of cicatrization of man and the normal rate may give some indication of the general state of the patient. Another advantage is that the determination of the index is no longer controlled by the temporary accidents which may happen between the two observations of S and S'.
We have already described briefly the portals of entry and of excretion of the pathogenic spirochetes. We may mention here that we have twice prevented epidemics by disinfection of the ground and the removal of the inundated water in certain places in coal mines. In one mine 19 out of 50 workmen, and in another 9 out of 30 workmen came down with Weil's disease in about 2 weeks. We have already pointed out that the period during which the pathogenic spirochetes are excreted in the urine continues, as a rule, for 40 days, and that we must, therefore, apply disinfection for at least 40 days after the first appearance of the disease. Lately we have found that in 21 cases out of 24 the spirochetes were excreted in the urine for 40 days, in one case until the 42nd day, in one case until the 45th day, and in still another case until the 63rd day. Another important fact concerning the prophylaxis which has been brought out is that both house and ditch rats (brown) carry virulent Spirochaeta icterohamorrhagae, the causal spirochete of Weil's disease, in their kidneys. Miyajima has reported that field rats have the pathogenic organisms in their kidneys; he will report these findings in detail later. The spirochetes which he described are less virulent than ours. On his advice we have carefully examined house and ditch rats in the city and rats in the coal mines of Kyushu, where Weil's disease prevails, and found that 39.5 per cent carried highly virulent pathogenic spirochetes in their kidneys, thus confirming Miyajima's experiments. The kidneys were examined microscopically under the dark-field microscope, and in the cases in which we did not find the pathogenic spirochete, we made inoculations into guinea pigs. Thus we found Spirochaeta icterohaemorrhagiae microscopically in the kidneys or in the urine in 32.4 per cent, and by means of inoculation in 7 per cent, making a total of 39.5 per cent carrying the pathogenic organisms, out of a total number of 86 rats examined. In some instances, rats were made to bite guinea pigs and in two instances caused Weil's disease. Among fifty-five patients in our clinic, twelve were cooks; and in Europe many cases arise among butchers-indicating the relation of the disease to rats. Moreover, during the present year we observed two patients who acquired Weil's disease, one in 1 week, the other 8 to 9 days after they had been bitten by rats. These facts point to a relation between Weil's disease and rats. The infection is transmitted probably from rats to man by means of the urine of the rats, directly or indirectly. On the injection of 0.1 gm. of rat urine which contains Spirochaeta icterohaemorrhagiae into the peritoneal cavity of guinea pigs, the infection arises, while the injection of the liver or the blood of the rats into guinea pigs does not produce the typical disease. The finding that the kidneys of rats contain the pathogenic organisms of the disease is important from the point of view of prophylaxis. The large number of rats in the trenches of the European battle-fields suggests the possibility that many cases of Weil's disease may arise. We shall report on this point in more detail later.
